



Home | Chevron Lubricants










  
































Other Chevron Sites



For Consumers



For Businesses








Motor Oils


Fuel System Cleaner


Chevron Stations









Heavy Duty Engine Oils


Industrial Lubricants


Marine Lubricants


Chemicals









Other Chevron Sites





For Consumers

Motor Oils
Fuel System Cleaner
Chevron Stations




For Businesses

Heavy Duty Engine Oils
Industrial Lubricants
Marine Lubricants
Chemicals
















CHEVRON
MARKETERS
CONTACT
Worldwide


USA

English


Canada

English


Czech Republic

Czech


China

Chinese


Finland

Finnish


France

French


Germany

German


Italy

Italian


Hungary

Hungarian


Indonesia

English


Latin America

Espanol


Netherlands

Dutch


Malaysia

English


MENA

English


Myanmar

English


New Zealand

English


Pakistan

English


Philippines

English


Poland

Polish


Russia

Russian


Singapore

English


South Africa

English


Sweden

Swedish


Thailand

Thai


United Kingdom

English


Vietnam

English





USA















Chevron Lubricants























NEXT






1.5 Million Miles Achieved Using Delo 400 Engine Oil
The Delo family of products delivers bottom-line value.  R.E. West Transportation tore down a series 60 Detroit Diesel engine with 1.5 million miles using Delo 400.  The parts showed minimal wear and will continue to be used extending the life of the vehicle.







NEXT






Is Your Equipment Working as Hard as It Can?
Lost energy leads to lost productivity. Chevron premium hydraulic oils are specially formulated to maximize useful work and oil life. 


Learn More





NEXT






A Trusted Brand forTotal Engine Protection
A car is one of the biggest investments you will make, so treat it right and use Havoline® with Deposit Shield® Technology Motor Oil that has been trusted by motorists for more than 100 years.










                    1.5 Million Miles Achieved Using Delo 400 Engine Oil
                






                    Is Your Equipment Working as Hard as It Can?
                






                    A Trusted Brand for Total Engine Protection
                












Chevron Lubricants
has 30 years' experience manufacturing finished lubricants with premium base oils to deliver excellent, reliable performance in a wide range of operating conditions.


















Commercial Transportation
Premium products for bumper-to-bumper protection helping achieve the most performance out of every mile; maximizing vehicle uptime and minimizing operating costs.
Delo® Heavy Duty Engine Oils









Passenger Vehicles
Premium lubricants for your car and truck.
Havoline®












Industrial & Off-Highway Equipment
Advanced lubricants for heavy-duty, off-road applications combined with our industry knowledge and customized services help maximize equipment uptime and reduce overall cost.
Learn More









Marine Lubricants
For Inland marine products, visit Inland/Coastal Marine
For deep-sea marine, visit
Chevron Marine Products



























3 Easy Steps To Calculate Clean 

Learn how you can increase the life expectancy of your equipment.



Learn More











With Industrial Equipment

Minimize down time.
Maximize hydraulic oil life.



Get Expert Advice











Manage Your Premium Product Sales

The PitPack oil dispensing system helps you manage the complexity of growing premium product sales and the challenge of carrying the products that your customers demand–all within less space!  



Learn More





















Home


About Us

Our Brands


Marketer Locator


Contact Us



Our Knowledge

Knowing Our Customers


Customer Testimonials


ISOCLEAN Program


RBL-Run Better Longer


Technical Resources



Products

Commercial Transportation


Industrial and Off-Highway Equipment


Passenger Vehicles


Inland Marine



Services

ISOCLEAN Services


LubeWatch Oil Analysis Program










Chevron Worldwide


Chevron.com


Distributors







                      Connect with us 











                    © 2001 - 2017 Chevron U.S.A. Inc.  All rights reserved.
                    
                        
                            
                            Terms of Use 
|
Privacy Statement 
|
Sitemap 
|
SDS/MSDS/PDS 













Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc.: Private Company Information - Bloomberg









































  





















































































August 03, 2017 10:48 AM ET
Chemicals

Company Overview of Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc.



Snapshot People




Company Overview
Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc. manufactures, markets, and distributes petroleum products. The company offers engine oils, lubricants, and coolants. It also provides Delo 400 API CK-4 and FA-4 heavy duty engine oils; HDAX 7200 Low Ash Gas Engine Oil SAE 40, which is designed for stationaextreme environments; and Clarity synthetic EA hydraulic and gear oils for the marine industry and other applicationary gas engines in gas compression, and processing or co-generation applications. The company is based in San Ramon, California. Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc. operates as a subsidiary of Chevron U.S.A. Inc.


6001 Bollinger Canyon RoadSan Ramon, CA 94583-2324United States



Phone: 925-842-3334

Fax: 925-842-8370








Key Executives for Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc.


Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc. does not have any Key Executives recorded. 



Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc. Key Developments

Chevron Products Company Announces the availability of Larger and Higher Performing Line of Delo 400 API CK-4 and FA-4 Heavy Duty Engine Oils
Dec 1 16
Chevron Products Company announced the availability of its larger and higher performing line of Delo 400 API CK-4 and FA-4 heavy duty engine oils (HDEO). This new product line is engineered using an advanced formulation of Chevron’s proprietary ISOSYN engine oil formulation, ISOSYN Advanced Technology. Chevron’s ISOSYN Advanced Technology is a unique combination of Chevron’s formulating expertise, high performance additive chemistry and premium base oils that helps extend the durability of critical diesel engine parts. The new Delo 400 with ISOSYN Advanced Technology product line offers up to: 68% better wear protection. 46% better piston deposit control. 35% better oxidation control.


Chevron Products Co. Wins $12.65 Million Federal Contract
Oct 17 15
Chevron Products Co., San Ramon, California, was awarded a $12,653,828 federal contract by the Defense Logistics Agency for aviation fuel products for the U.S. Navy and DLA in Hawaii.


Chevron Products Company Introduces ISOCLEAN® Certified Lubricants and Services
Oct 7 15
Chevron Products Company announced the launch of its ISOCLEAN Program, a national program that offers a solution to particle contamination through products and in-plant services designed to assist customers in maximizing the life of their equipment by meeting stringent quality control standards set by original equipment manufacturers (OEMs). Chevron’s ISOCLEAN program includes ISOCLEAN Certified Lubricants, which have been certified to meet the fluid ISO Cleanliness requirements of OEMs, and ISOCLEAN Services, which are in-plant services designed to clean up and manage contamination of in-service lubricants and operating systems. Both offerings are dependent on each other and help to reduce wear, decrease unscheduled downtime and extend the life of equipment. Chevron’s ISOCLEAN Certified Lubricants meet a specific ISO Cleanliness code at the point of delivery, which represents the most stringent cleanliness standards and specifications for lubricants placed in equipment that are required by several OEMs. An important first step in controlling lubricant contamination is starting with a certified lubricant. These products help reduce the expense and manpower required by end customers to pre-filter non-certified lubricants to meet OEM requirements. ISOCLEAN Services are performed by a national certified network of service providers at the plant location. Controlling particle contamination for in-service equipment is another critical element in maintaining efficient operation. The portfolio of services performed may include: Fluid purification and dehydration; Varnish removal and mitigation; High velocity flushing; Reservoir and tank cleaning; Condition monitoring and system audits; Fluid handling consultation. Chevron began rolling out its ISOCLEAN program in early 2015 and has developed a national network of ISOCLEAN Certified Lubricant Marketers. The program has seen such dramatic success that it will begin to expand internationally in 2016. The company’s goal is to significantly increase the number of certified marketers throughout many regions.


Similar Private Companies By Industry



Company Name
Region



 10x Technology LLC United States 20/20 Custom Molded Plastics,Ltd. United States 21st Century Plastics Corporation United States 2N2, Inc. United States 4th Generation Resins, LLC United States




Recent Private Companies Transactions



TypeDate
Target





Private Placement

			      December 14, 2016
			    
Novvi, LLC





Request Profile Update


				\
	














 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



Most Searched Private Companies



Company Name
Geographic Region



 Lawyers Committee for Civil Rights Under Law United States NYC2012, Inc. United States The Advertising Council, Inc. United States Bertelsmann AG Europe Rush University United States













Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Chevron Products Company U.S.A. Inc., please visit --.  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close






























Chevron Corporation - Human Energy — Chevron.com



























































skip to main content













providing energyforprogress 


providing energyforprogressview our global project portfolio







providing energyforprogress





close related topics to this story















creating prosperityin theUnited Kingdom  


creating prosperityin theUnited Kingdom see our economic impact in this infographic






read related topics to this story






creating prosperityin theUnited Kingdom 



related topics

Corporate Responsibility 
Creating Prosperity 
Economic Development 





close related topics to this story








            creating prosperityin theUnited Kingdom 
        
Chevron is generating significant economic benefits in the United Kingdom.

 see our economic impact in this infographic
 


7/25/2017
Features










supersizing the outputof asupergiant field 	 


supersizing the outputof asupergiant field 	learn about Kazakhstan's tengiz field 	







supersizing the outputof asupergiant field 	





close related topics to this story








            supersizing the outputof asupergiant field 	
        
Object reference not set to an instance of an object.   at Glass.Mapper.Sc.GlassHtml.MakeEditable[T](Expression`1 field, Expression`1 standardOutput, T model, Object parameters, Context context, Database database, TextWriter writer)

 learn about Kazakhstan's tengiz field 	
 


1/1/0001














in the news


Chevron Reports Second Quarter Net Income of $1.5 Billion
read more




Chevron Announces Quarterly Dividend
read more




United States Supreme Court Denies Petition for Review by Lawyer Behind Fraudulent Ecuador Lawsuit
read more




Chevron Highlights 2016 Performance and Future Plans at Annual Meeting of Stockholders
read more




Chevron Reports First Quarter
Net Income of $2.7 Billion
read more



view press releases













i am … 
a process control engineer



watch a day in the life of a chevron employee














emergingtechnologies  


emergingtechnologies about state-of-the-art energy innovations







emergingtechnologies 





close related topics to this story











wild files:monarch butterfliesof north america  


wild files:monarch butterfliesof north america about our commitment to biodiversity 






read related topics to this story






wild files:monarch butterfliesof north america 



related topics

Corporate Responsibility 
Biodiversity 
Operational Excellence 





close related topics to this story









 








 media

Resources
Inquiries
Press releases
All news



 customers

Chevron stations
Credit cards/bill pay
Lubricants
Texaco stations



 careers

Find a job
Meet our people
Recruiting events
Students and recent graduates



 worldwide

Australia
China
Indonesia
Worldwide index


















Singapore — Chevron.com



























































skip to main content










highlights of operations


business portfolio


in the community


record of achievement


contact us








Singapore










highlightsofoperations



                    highlights of operations
                
Singapore plays a critical role in Chevron’s global operations.
Singapore is the regional headquarters for our Downstream operations in the Asia-Pacific region, including our manufacturing, marketing and lubricants businesses. We operate under our subsidiary Chevron International Pte. Ltd. Chevron’s supply and trading business has a regional trading hub in Singapore. 
Our lubricant additives manufacturing facility in Singapore, operated by Chevron Oronite Pte. Ltd., is the largest in Asia. Chevron has a 50 percent interest in a Singapore refinery that produces petroleum products for the Asia-Pacific region. Through our joint venture Chevron Phillips Chemical Company LLC and its affiliates, Chevron also has an interest in Chevron Phillips Singapore Chemicals (Private) Limited.
The Caltex® brand, which serves customers in the Asia-Pacific region and Africa, is managed from Singapore. There is a network of Caltex service stations and convenience stores in Singapore as well.

businessportfolio



                    business portfolio
                
In Singapore, our Chevron International Products business unit manages all of our Downstream fuels businesses and joint ventures outside the Americas. That includes commercial and retail merchandising, marketing, terminal operations, and the promotion and sale of Caltex fuels in the Asia-Pacific region, Africa and the Middle East. The organization also directs Chevron’s joint-venture manufacturing in Asia and joint-venture aviation activities in the Middle East.
refining
Chevron has a 50 percent interest in the Singapore Refining Company (SRC).

SRC’s refinery processes up to 290,000 barrels of crude oil per day, producing liquefied petroleum gas, gasoline, jet fuel, diesel, fuel oil and asphalt. In 2016, construction continued on SRC’s gasoline clean fuels facility and cogeneration plant. The new facilities are expected to increase the refinery’s ability to produce higher-value gasoline and improve energy efficiency. The project is expected to be completed in 2017.
supply and trading
Chevron’s Singapore Supply and Trading office is home to one of the company’s four global trading floors, along with London; Houston, Texas; and San Ramon, California. The organization manages daily commodity transactions of 5 million barrels of liquids and 5 billion cubic feet of gas. 
marketing and lubricants
The Caltex® brand – Chevron’s main marketing brand in Asia-Pacific and Africa – is managed from Singapore. 
Chevron offers Caltex products, including Caltex gasoline with Techron® and Caltex Diesel with Techron D®, to consumers in Singapore. Through our Caltex stations and distributors, we also market Delo® and Havoline® lubricants and coolants, along with other lubricating oils and greases, to consumer and business customers. In addition, Havoline® engine lubricants and coolants for passenger cars and motorcycles and Delo® diesel engine oils, greases, other lubricating oils and Techron® Concentrate Plus fuel additives are marketed to consumer, commercial and industrial customers. 
As of early 2017, Chevron has 26 Caltex service stations, 25 Star Mart convenience stores and one mini mart in Singapore. In 2016, Chevron partnered with NTUC Link to join the Plus! loyalty program, which enables motorists to earn and use LinkPoints for eligible fuel transactions at Caltex stations.
Chevron also markets asphalt and fuels to inland industrial and commercial customers. 
Chevron is a major aviation fuel supplier in Singapore. We safely supply the fuel to airlines at Singapore Changi International Airport.

From Singapore, we also market marine fuels and lubricants to customers in Asia.
chemicals
Chevron Oronite
Singapore is the Asia-Pacific regional headquarters for our subsidiary Chevron Oronite Pte. Ltd. Our Singapore manufacturing plant on Jurong Island is the largest additives manufacturing facility in the Asia-Pacific region. Our additives enhance the performance of lubricants in marine, automotive, railroad and natural gas engines as well as in specialty industrial engines and equipment. Additives from our Singapore plant are sold in more than 15 countries throughout the region and are shipped to distribution points worldwide.
The plant has continued to expand since its commissioning in 1999 and has a major project currently underway to add carboxylate production. Carboxylate is a sulfur-free detergent used in high-performance additive packages. A similar unit is already in place in Gonfreville, France, and the addition of the new plant in Singapore will about double Oronite’s global carboxylate capacity upon completion, planned for the fourth quarter of 2017.
Chevron Phillips Chemical Company LLC
Chevron is involved in a chemical facility in Singapore through our joint venture Chevron Phillips Chemical Company LLC (CPChem).
CPChem has a 50 percent interest in Chevron Phillips Singapore Chemicals (Private) Limited, a joint venture that operates a high-density polyethylene (HDPE) manufacturing plant on Jurong Island. HDPE is used in pressure piping, gasoline containers and tanks, and soap and detergent bottles, among other things.

inthecommunity



                    in the community
                
Chevron’s global initiative, Fuel Your School, has been modified specifically for Singapore. In 2015, we partnered with the Central Singapore Community Development Council to develop Fuel Your School–STEM @ Central Singapore. The program encourages lower secondary school students to pursue their interest in science, technology, engineering and mathematics (STEM) subjects. For two years, participants have engaged in carefully curated learning projects and hands-on activities that help bridge textbook knowledge with real-world applications. At one workshop, approximately 240 junior engineers were inspired by the anti-gravity hover vehicles often featured in science fiction movies to design and ultimately fly their own prototypes. Students used advanced concepts such as magnetism, sensor technology, electronics, mechanical engineering and vector forces to build and fly their creations. Those with the most impressive vehicles – as chosen by a panel of judges and the community via social media – received cash prizes for their respective schools, helping fund the schools’ mathematics and science departments.
From 2012 through 2014, Chevron Singapore partnered with the People’s Association in Caltex PAssion for Kids, an enrichment program targeted at underserved families. This initiative inspired learning in underprivileged children in primary and secondary schools by giving them the opportunity to gain knowledge and develop new skills in different ways. 
Chevron Singapore received the Community Spirit Award from the People’s Association in recognition of our contributions to the community in 2011, 2013, 2014, 2015 and 2016.

recordofachievement



                    record of achievement
                
In 1933, Chevron entered the Singapore market through The Texas Company (China) Ltd., a former Texaco company. In 1936, a partnership between Chevron and Texaco created the Caltex® brand. In 1937, Caltex introduced its first fuel oil and diesel fuel bunkering terminals. Operations started at the Tanjong Pagar Terminal in 1938. Caltex significantly expanded operations in 1958 with the addition of another bunkering terminal. In 1964, a lubricants blending plant was built in Tanjong Penjuru.
Texaco merged with Chevron in 2001.
introducing lubricant additives
In 1972, Chevron Oronite opened a sales office in Singapore for Oronite® additives. In 1995, Singapore became the Asia-Pacific regional hub for Oronite.
In 1999, we built our Singapore manufacturing plant, the largest lubricant additives manufacturing plant in Asia.
a leader in refining
In 1979, Chevron, through Caltex, became a one-third partner in Singapore Refining Company.
The partners upgraded the refinery in the 1980s by adding visbreaker, reformer and hydrocracking units, which greatly increased the refinery’s capacity and enabled it to meet changing demands in the market.
In 1995, the refinery was further upgraded at a cost of $1 billion. A residual fluid cracking unit and other associated facilities were installed, which increased production of gasoline and diesel.
Singapore became the regional headquarters for Chevron’s Asia-Pacific Downstream operations in 2001. 
The refinery’s crude oil processing capacity continued to grow steadily. In 2004, Chevron’s interest in SRC increased to 50 percent. 
From 2013 to 2016, Singapore was headquarters for the company’s Asia-Pacific exploration and production operations. 
operational excellence
As a business partner and as a member of the community, Chevron is committed to creating superior value for our investors, customers and partners, the Singapore government, local communities, and our workforce.
Operational excellence – which we define as the “systematic management of process safety, personal safety and health, environment, reliability, and efficiency to achieve world-class performance” – is a critical driver for business success and a key part of our enterprise execution strategy.
honored in the business community
We and our affiliates have made significant contributions to Singapore as investors and employers for more than 80 years.
Our commitment to Singapore was recognized by the Economic Development Board in 2005, when Chevron received the Distinguished Partner in Progress Award for our commitment to developing Singapore’s manufacturing industry and for our contributions to the people and economy of Singapore.
In 2009 and 2010, Chevron Singapore was recognized for our human resources (HR) initiatives. The Singapore Human Resources Institute honored Chevron with the following awards:

Leading HR Practices Award in Strategic HR
Talent Management 
Retention and Succession Planning
Employment Relations and People Management
Health and Employee Wellness
Workplace Safety and Health
Learning and Human Capital Development

In 2010, Chevron won the Grass Roots Asia Pacific Award for Best Reward and Recognition Strategies at the HRM Awards Singapore.

contactus



                    contact us
                
Chevron Singapore Pte Ltd
Chevron International Pte Ltd

30 Raffles Place, #21-00 Chevron House
Singapore 048622
Telephone: +65.6318.1000
Chevron Singapore Public Affairs Email: pgpa.singapore@chevron.com
Employment Opportunities: Careers at Chevron
Chevron Singapore Data Protection Officer Email: dposingapore@chevron.com

Chevron Oronite Pte Ltd

21 Sakra Road
Singapore 627890
Telephone: +65.6867.6557





Cautionary Statement


disclosure;forward-lookingstatements




CAUTIONARY STATEMENT RELEVANT TO FORWARD-LOOKING INFORMATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF "SAFE HARBOR" PROVISIONS OF THE PRIVATE SECURITIES LITIGATION REFORM ACT OF 1995
This Site contains forward-looking statements relating to Chevron’s operations that are based on management’s current expectations, estimates and projections about the petroleum, chemicals and other energy related industries. Words or phrases such as “anticipates,” “expects,” “intends,” “plans,” “targets,” “forecasts,” “projects,” “believes,” “seeks,” “schedules,” “estimates,” “positions,” “pursues,” “may,” “could,” “should,” “budgets,” “outlook,” “focus,” “on schedule,” “on track,” “goals,” “objectives,” “strategies” and similar expressions are intended to identify such forward looking statements. These statements are not guarantees of future performance and are subject to certain risks, uncertainties and other factors, many of which are beyond the company’s control and are difficult to predict. Therefore, actual outcomes and results may differ materially from what is expressed or forecasted in such forward-looking statements. The reader should not place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date issued. Unless legally required, Chevron undertakes no obligation to update publicly any forward-looking statements, whether as a result of new information, future events or otherwise.
Among the important factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements are: changing crude oil and natural gas prices; changing refining, marketing and chemicals margins; the company's ability to realize anticipated cost savings and expenditure reductions; actions of competitors or regulators; timing of exploration expenses; timing of crude oil liftings; the competitiveness of alternate-energy sources or product substitutes; technological developments; the results of operations and financial condition of the company's suppliers, vendors, partners and equity affiliates, particularly during extended periods of low prices for crude oil and natural gas; the inability or failure of the company’s joint-venture partners to fund their share of operations and development activities; the potential failure to achieve expected net production from existing and future crude oil and natural gas development projects; potential delays in the development, construction or start-up of planned projects; the potential disruption or interruption of the company’s operations due to war, accidents, political events, civil unrest, severe weather, cyber threats and terrorist acts, crude oil production quotas or other actions that might be imposed by the Organization of Petroleum Exporting Countries, or other natural or human causes beyond its control; changing economic, regulatory and political environments in the various countries in which the company operates; general domestic and international economic and political conditions; the potential liability for remedial actions or assessments under existing or future environmental regulations and litigation; significant operational, investment or product changes required by existing or future environmental statutes and regulations, including international agreements and national or regional legislation and regulatory measures to limit or reduce greenhouse gas emissions; the potential liability resulting from other pending or future litigation; the company’s future acquisition or disposition of assets or the delay or failure of such transactions to close based on required closing conditions set forth in the applicable transaction agreements; the potential for gains and losses from asset dispositions or impairments; government-mandated sales, divestitures, recapitalizations, industry-specific taxes, changes in fiscal terms or restrictions on scope of company operations; foreign currency movements compared with the U.S. dollar; material reductions in corporate liquidity and access to debt markets; the effects of changed accounting rules under generally accepted accounting principles promulgated by rule-setting bodies; the company's ability to identify and mitigate the risks and hazards inherent in operating in the global energy industry; and the factors set forth under the heading “Risk Factors” on pages 20 through 22 of the company’s 2016 Annual Report on Form 10-K. Other unpredictable or unknown factors not discussed could also have material adverse effects on forward-looking statements.
Certain terms, such as "unrisked resources," "unrisked resource base," "recoverable resources," “potentially recoverable volumes” and "original oil in place," among others, may be used to describe certain aspects of the company's portfolio and oil and gas properties beyond the proved reserves. For definitions of, and further information regarding, these and other terms, see the "Glossary of Energy and Financial Terms" on pages 50 and 51 of the company's 2016 Supplement to the Annual Report. As used in this report, the term "project" may describe new upstream development activity, including phases in a multiphase development, maintenance activities, certain existing assets, new investments in downstream and chemicals capacity, investment in emerging and sustainable energy activities, and certain other activities. All of these terms are used for convenience only and are not intended as a precise description of the term "project" as it relates to any specific government law or regulation.
All trademarks, service marks, logos and trade names, whether registered or unregistered, are proprietary to Chevron, its affiliates, or to other companies where so indicated. You may not reproduce, download or otherwise use any such trademarks, service marks, logos or trade names without the prior written consent of the appropriate owner thereof.




                Print Page





downloads






2016 Annual Report







2016 Corporate Responsibility Report







The Chevron Way - English





more resources

Caltex - Singapore
Oronite
Go to Chevron Careers
Glossary of Energy and Financial Terms








share this page:


















Chevron Corp (CVX.N)  Company Profile | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















Profile: Chevron Corp (CVX.N)





Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerEnergyOil & Gas Refining and Marketing












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				CVX.N on New York Stock Exchange


				110.46USD
2 Aug 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $-0.32


					            (-0.29%)
					        






Prev Close

$110.78


Open

$110.39




Day's High

$111.19


Day's Low

$109.85




Volume

1,962,477


Avg. Vol

1,795,783




52-wk High

$119.00


52-wk Low

$97.53












					Full Description



Chevron Corporation (Chevron), incorporated on January 27, 1926, manages its investments in subsidiaries and affiliates, and provides administrative, financial, management and technology support to the United States and international subsidiaries that engage in integrated energy and chemicals operations. The Company operates through two business segments: Upstream and Downstream. Upstream operations consist primarily of exploring for, developing and producing crude oil and natural gas; liquefaction, transportation and regasification associated with liquefied natural gas (LNG); transporting crude oil by international oil export pipelines; processing, transporting, storage and marketing of natural gas, and a gas-to-liquids plant. Downstream operations consist primarily of refining of crude oil into petroleum products; marketing of crude oil and refined products; transporting of crude oil and refined products by pipeline, marine vessel, motor equipment and rail car, and manufacturing and marketing of commodity petrochemicals, plastics for industrial uses, and fuel and lubricant additives.UpstreamThe Company sells crude oil and natural gas from its producing operations under various contractual obligations. The Upstream activities in the United States are primarily located in the midcontinent region, the Gulf of Mexico, California and the Appalachian Basin. In California, the Company has production in the San Joaquin Valley. Chevron is also engaged in various exploration, development and production activities in the deepwater Gulf of Mexico. The Company has interests in deepwater Jack and St. Malo fields. The Company has interest in the production host facility, which is designed to accommodate production from the Jack/St. Malo development and third-party tiebacks. Chevron is the operator of an exploration and appraisal program and potential development named Tigris, covering a range of jointly held offshore leases in the northwest portion of Keathley Canyon. The Company's activities in the midcontinent region are primarily in Colorado, New Mexico, Oklahoma and Texas. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had approximately 500,000 and 1,000,000 net acres of shale and tight resources in the Midland and Delaware basins, respectively in the Permian Basin of West Texas and southeast New Mexico. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had approximately 472,000 net acres in the Marcellus Shale and 309,000 net acres in the Utica Shale, primarily located in southwestern Pennsylvania, eastern Ohio and the West Virginia panhandle.The Company's Other Americas includes Argentina, Brazil, Canada, Colombia, Greenland, Mexico, Suriname, Trinidad and Tobago and Venezuela. The Upstream activities in Canada are concentrated in Alberta, British Columbia and the offshore Atlantic region. The Company also has exploration interests in the Beaufort Sea region of the Northwest Territories. The Company holds interest in the Hibernia Field, which consists of the Hibernia and Ben Nevis Avalon (BNA) reservoirs, and in the unitized Hibernia Southern Extension (HSE) areas offshore Atlantic Canada. As of December 31, 2016, the Company has working interest in two exploration blocks in the Flemish Pass Basin offshore Newfoundland. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had approximately 228,000 net acres in the Duvernay Shale in Alberta and approximately 200,000 overlying acres in the Montney tight rock formation. It holds interest in the proposed Kitimat LNG and Pacific Trail Pipeline projects. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had interest in 300,000 net acres in the Horn River and Liard shale gas basins in British Columbia. The Company has interest in Aitken Creek and in the Alberta Hub natural gas storage facilities.In Greenland, the Company holds interest in Blocks 9 and 14 located in the Kanumas Area, offshore the northeast coast of Greenland. It holds interest in an exploration license for Block 3 in the deepwater Perdido area of the Gulf of Mexico. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had interest in two concessions covering approximately 73,000 net acres in the Vaca Muerta Shale formation in Argentina. In Brazil, Chevron holds interests in the Frade and Papa-Terra deepwater fields located in the Campos Basin. Additionally, Chevron holds an interest in Block CE-M715, located in the Ceara Basin offshore Brazil. It operates the offshore Chuchupa and the onshore Ballena natural gas fields. It holds interest in deepwater Blocks 42 and 45 offshore Suriname. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had interest in three blocks in the East Coast Marine Area offshore Trinidad, which includes the Dolphin, Dolphin Deep and Starfish natural gas fields. Chevron's production activities in Venezuela are performed by two affiliates in western Venezuela and an affiliate in the Orinoco Belt.In Africa, Chevron is engaged in upstream activities Congo, Liberia, Morocco, Nigeria and Republic of Congo. In Angola, the Company operates and holds interest in Block 0, a concession adjacent to the Cabinda coastline, and has interest in a production-sharing contract (PSC) for deepwater Block 14. The Company also holds an interest in the Congo River Canyon Crossing Pipeline project. Chevron operates and holds an interest in the Lianzi Unitization Zone, located in an area shared equally by Angola and Republic of Congo. It has interest in an offshore concession in Democratic Republic of the Congo. It holds interest in the offshore Haute Mer permit areas (Nkossa, Nsoko and Moho-Bilondo) in Republic of Congo. It holds interest in Block LB-14 off the coast of Liberia. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had three operated deepwater areas offshore Morocco. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had interest in eight operated concessions in the onshore and near-offshore regions of the Niger Delta. Chevron operates and holds an interest in the Agbami Field, located in deepwater Oil Mining Lease (OML) 127 and OML 128.In Asia, the Company is engaged in upstream activities in Azerbaijan, Bangladesh, China, Indonesia, Kazakhstan, the Kurdistan Region of Iraq, Myanmar, the Partitioned Zone located between Saudi Arabia and Kuwait, the Philippines, Russia and Thailand. In Azerbaijan, Chevron holds interest in the Azerbaijan International Operating Company (AIOC) and the crude oil production from the Azeri-Chirag-Gunashli (ACG) fields. Chevron also has interest in the Baku-Tbilisi-Ceyhan (BTC) Pipeline affiliate, which transports the majority of ACG production from Baku, Azerbaijan, through Georgia to Mediterranean deepwater port facilities at Ceyhan, Turkey. In Kazakhstan, the Company has interest in the Tengizchevroil (TCO) affiliate and a non-operated working interest in the Karachaganak Field. In Bangladesh, the Company operates and holds interest in Block 12 (Bibiyana Field) and Blocks 13 and 14 (Jalalabad and Moulavi Bazar fields). In China, Chevron has operated and non-operated working interests in various areas in China. In China, the Company operates and holds interest in the Chuandongbei Project, located onshore in the Sichuan Basin. The Company also has non-operated working interests in the QHD 32-6 Field, in Block 11/19 in the Bohai Bay, and in Block 16/19 in the Pearl River Mouth Basin. In Indonesia, Chevron holds working interests through various PSCs in Indonesia. It holds contractor interests in the Sarta and Qara Dagh PSCs.In Australia/Oceania, the Company is engaged in upstream activities in Australia and New Zealand. In Australia, Chevron's upstream activities are concentrated in offshore Western Australia. As of December 31, 2016, the Company operated two LNG projects, Gorgon and Wheatstone, and has a non-operated working interest in the North West Shelf (NWS) Venture and exploration acreage in the Browse Basin and the Carnarvon Basin. The Company also holds exploration acreage in the Bight Basin offshore South Australia. Chevron holds interest in the Gorgon Project, which includes the development of the Gorgon and Jansz-Io fields. The Company also operates Wheatstone Project, which includes the development of the Wheatstone and Iago fields. Chevron has a non-operated working interest in the NWS Venture in Western Australia. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had interest in three blocks in the Browse Basin. As of December 31, 2016, the Company had interest and operated three deepwater exploration permits in the offshore Pegasus and East Coast basins. In Europe, the Company is engaged in upstream activities in Denmark, Norway and the United Kingdom. As of December 31, 2016, it had interest in the Danish Underground Consortium (DUC), which produces crude oil and natural gas from 13 North Sea fields. It holds interest in Alder Project, Clair Ridge Project and Rosebank Project in the United Kingdom. It has interest in exploration Block PL 859, located in the Barents Sea.DownstreamThe Company markets petroleum products under the principal brands of Chevron, Texaco and Caltex throughout various parts of the world. In the United States, the Company markets its products under the Chevron and Texaco brands. As of December 31, 2016, the Company supplied directly or through retailers and marketers approximately 7,800 Chevron- and Texaco-branded motor vehicle service stations, primarily in the southern and western states. As of December 31, 2016, approximately 325 of these outlets were Company-owned or -leased stations. As of December 31, 2016, Chevron supplied directly or through retailers and marketers approximately 6,000 branded service stations, including affiliates outside the United States. In British Columbia, Canada, the Company markets under the Chevron brand. The Company markets in Latin America using the Texaco brand. In the Asia-Pacific region, southern Africa and the Middle East, the Company uses the Caltex brand. The Company also operates through affiliates under various brand names. The Company also markets a line of lubricant and coolant products under the product names Havoline, Delo, Ursa, Meropa, Rando, Clarity and Taro in the United States, and around the wolrd under the three brands: Chevron, Texaco and Caltex.Chevron Oronite Company develops, manufactures and markets performance additives for lubricating oils and fuels and conducts research and development for additive component and blended packages. Chevron owns interest in its Chevron Phillips Chemical Company LLC (CPChem) affiliate. PChem produces olefins, polyolefins and alpha olefins and is a supplier of aromatics and polyethylene pipe, in addition to participating in the specialty chemical and specialty plastics markets. Chevron also has operations in the petrochemical business through GS Caltex, an affiliate of the Company. GS Caltex manufactures aromatics, including benzene, toluene and xylene. These base chemicals are used to produce a range of products, including adhesives, plastics and textile fibers. GS Caltex also produces polypropylene, which is used to make automotive and home appliance parts, food packaging, laboratory equipment and textiles.Chevron owns and operates a network of crude oil, natural gas and product pipelines and other infrastructure assets in the United States. The Company's marine fleet includes both the United States- and foreign-flagged vessels. The United States -flagged vessels are engaged primarily in transporting refined products in the coastal waters of the United States. The foreign-flagged vessels transport crude oil, LNG, refined products and feedstocks in support of the Company's global Upstream and Downstream businesses. The Company's other business include Research and Technology, and Environmental Protection. The Company's energy technology organization supports upstream and downstream businesses. The Company designs, operates and maintains its facilities to avoid potential spills or leaks and to minimize the impact of those that may occur.

» Full Overview of CVX.N







					Company Address



Chevron Corp
6001 Bollinger Canyon RdSAN RAMON   CA   94583-2324
P: +1925.8421000F: +1302.6365454







					Company Web Links



Home Page








					Officers & Directors






Name
Compensation




							 John Watson

24,657,500




							 Michael Wirth

9,129,640




							 Patricia Yarrington

6,541,420




							 Pierre Breber

--




							 Joseph Geagea

7,945,190




» More Officers & Directors





					Chevron Corp News




Exxon Mobil profit disappoints Wall Street, Chevron shines
| 


Jul 28 2017 
WRAPUP 2-Exxon Mobil profit disappoints Wall Street, Chevron shines

Jul 28 2017 
Chevron swings to quarterly profit as costs drop
| 


Jul 28 2017 
BRIEF-Chevron sees steady growth in Permian Shale operations

Jul 28 2017 
UPDATE 1-Chevron swings to quarterly profit as costs drop

Jul 28 2017 


» More CVX.N  News
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerEnergyOil & Gas Refining and Marketing





















 



	Chevron Careers Home





































Home 
Find a Job 
Types of Jobs 
Students & Recent Graduates 
Working at Chevron 




Chevron.com 
Contact 


 



Home
Find a Job
Types of Jobs
Students & Recent Graduates
Working at Chevron













 




  
Our team has the technology to take on big challenges, the integrity to do it responsibly and the drive to keep moving the world forward.Find a Job

  
Chevron and scientists apply their talents to some of the most challenging projects on the planet.Watch the videos

  
Everyone at Chevron is guided by a set of values called the Chevron Way. Watch how the Chevron Way has helped employees build successful careers.Watch the videos





 
Upcoming Recruiting Events
Check back with us soon for a list of fall 2017 events.

  
Oportunidades de Carreira
 A Chevron está à procura de Angolanos. 

  
Technical Jobs
 Facilities Engineering
Petroleum Engineering
Earth Science
Drilling and Completions














Chevron Corporation | 
        © 2001 - 2017 Chevron Corporation. All Rights Reserved. 
        Terms of Use | 
		
        Privacy | 
        Accessibility | 
        Fraudulent Offers


Connect with us:
Facebook
LinkedIn
Twitter
YouTube















 

	Chevron in Singapore: Country Operations: Chevron Careers































Home 
Find a Job 
Types of Jobs 
Students & Recent Graduates 
Working at Chevron 




Chevron.com 
Contact 





Home
Find a Job
Types of Jobs
Students & Recent Graduates
Working at Chevron











Singapore

Singapore Privacy Statement
Types of Jobs





Chevron in Singapore






Singapore
                    Job Openings



Since 1933, Singapore has played a critical role in Chevron's global operations. The International Products business unit, which covers Chevron's Downstream fuels businesses and joint ventures in Asia Pacific, Africa, Middle East, Pakistan and Europe, is headquartered in Singapore.
It is home to Chevron's Asia-Pacific headquarters for the Manufacturing, Supply and Trading, Marketing, and Lubricants operations. Chevron Upstream has a presence in Singapore through our shipping, global gas and power generation businesses. Chevron Asia Pacific Exploration and Production also has a regional office in Singapore. Other Singapore operations include shipping, global gas and power generation.
The Caltex™ brand, which serves customers in Asia, the Middle East and Africa, is managed from Singapore. Singapore is also Chevron Oronite's regional headquarters for Asia-Pacific and home to one of the largest fuel and lubricant additives manufacturing facility in Asia.

Who We Hire
Where You'll Work
How to Apply
Compensation and Benefits
Career Development Support

Who We Hire

        Chevron values integrity, trust, diversity and ingenuity as a company and in our
        employees. In Singapore, Chevron hires full-time employees with the relevant education
        and experience. We also look for individuals with the following qualities:
    

Have a collaborative work style.
Enjoy a diverse and teamwork-oriented environment.
Are solution-oriented and outcome-driven.


Back to Top

Where You'll Work

        Depending on your role, your journey at Chevron could take you to one or more of
        these locations in Singapore, as well as to other locations around the globe:

Jurong Island — Home to Chevron Oronite's regional headquarters for Asia-Pacific and Singapore manufacturing plant.
Raffles Place — Chevron Downstream Asia Pacific Headquarters is situated at Chevron House.  It is also a regional hub for Chevron Upstream & Gas.
Jalan Buroh — Chevron's fuels terminal and lubricants blending plant.


Click here
            to find out more about our business portfolio.

Back to Top

How to Apply

Singapore
            Job Openings

        If you are interested in combining your talents and ambition with those of our high-performing
        team, please 
            search and apply online.

        Only those candidates who are selected for an interview will be contacted.

Back to Top

Compensation and Benefits


        Chevron's compensation and benefits program include the following:

Competitive base pay
Health care coverage
Insurance
Educational assistance
Compressed workweek schedules
Annual incentive awards when the company meets its established goals


Back to Top

Career Development Support

        When you join Chevron, you’ll find a workplace committed to your professional development.
        You’ll receive the support and tools to create your own career path.

Back to Top




Related Resources

Find Out More on Chevron.com

Find out more
                about Chevron in Singapore
Find out more
                about Chevron Oronite




Recent Awards


Grass Roots Asia Pacific Award for Best Reward and Recognition
              Strategies


Corporate HR Award

Leading HR Practices
                
Strategic HR
Talent Management, Retention & Succession Planning
Employee Relations & People Management
Health & Employee Wellness


Special Mention
                
Learning & Human Capital Development
Performance Management

Empowering People for the Way Ahead

Read about Chevron HR in Human Capital Magazine published by People Trends Pte Ltd















Chevron Corporation | 
        © 2001 - 2017 Chevron Corporation. All Rights Reserved. 
        Terms of Use | 
		
        Privacy | 
        Accessibility | 
        Fraudulent Offers


Connect with us:
Facebook
LinkedIn
Twitter
YouTube
















	Find a Job































Home 
Find a Job 
Types of Jobs 
Students & Recent Graduates 
Working at Chevron 




Chevron.com 
Contact 





Home
Find a Job
Types of Jobs
Students & Recent Graduates
Working at Chevron











Find a Job

Hiring Process
Fraudulent Offers
Types of Jobs



Find a Job



Chevron conducts business in countries around the world which offers you diverse opportunities for continued growth — both professionally and personally. You'll work with colleagues around the world, you'll travel, and maybe you'll even live and work in another country. In all the locations and communities in which we operate, Chevron employees are united by common values and our mission to find new, cleaner ways to power the world.



			Choose a country to learn more about Chevron jobs around the world:
		
AngolaArgentinaAustraliaBangladeshBrazilCanadaChina and Hong KongColombiaFranceIndonesiaJapanKazakhstanMalaysiaNetherlandsNigeriaPhilippinesSaudi ArabiaSingaporeSouth AfricaThailandUnited KingdomUnited StatesVenezuela



			Additional Job Opportunities
		
Global Mobile AssignmentsMaritime OperationsRecruiting Events






Related Resources



Chevron never seeks fees from job applicants under any circumstances.
If you receive a job offer that you believe is fraudulent, contact your local police.

Find out more














Chevron Corporation | 
        © 2001 - 2017 Chevron Corporation. All Rights Reserved. 
        Terms of Use | 
		
        Privacy | 
        Accessibility | 
        Fraudulent Offers


Connect with us:
Facebook
LinkedIn
Twitter
YouTube

















雪佛龍 - 维基百科，自由的百科全书































 






雪佛龍

维基百科，自由的百科全书


					跳转至：					导航、					搜索



雪佛龍股份有限公司
Chevron Corporation









公司類型
公有股份（NYSE：CVX）


成立
1879年（美國加州Pico Canyon）


代表人物
戴維·奧萊利（David O'Reilly），執行長兼主席
史蒂夫·克羅（Steve Crowe），財務長


總部
美國加州聖拉蒙（San Ramon）


产业
石油石化


產品
石化


營業額
▲ US$ 2537億6百萬美金 (2011)[1]


息税前利润
▲ US$ 476億3千4百萬美金 (2011)[1]


净利润
▲ US$ 268億9千5百萬美金 (2011)[1]


總資產
▲ US$ 2094億7千4百萬美金 (2011)[1]


資產淨值
▲ US$ 1213億8千2百1十萬美金 (2011)[1]


員工人數
62,000 (2010)


网站
www.chevron.com


雪佛龍股份有限公司（英文：Chevron Corporation，NYSE：CVX）是世界最大的全球能源公司之一，總部位於美國加州聖拉蒙市（San Ramon）並在全球超過180個國家有業務。其業務範圍滲透石油及天然氣工業的各個方面：探測、生產、提煉、營銷、運輸、石化、發電等。雪佛龍原名加利福尼亞標準石油（Standard Oil of California，簡稱Socal），是1911年標準石油由於反托拉斯案分裂的結果。雪佛龍曾是20世紀初期統治世界石油工業的「七姊妹」之一。 2001年10月，雪佛龙以390亿美元兼并了其主要竞争对手之一德士古，并以雪佛龙-德士古（ChevronTexaco）作为公司的名称。2005年5月9日雪佛龙德士古宣布，更名为“雪佛龙公司”。



目录


1 历史
2 新政策和发展
3 市场品牌

3.1 燃油
3.2 便利店
3.3 润滑油
3.4 燃油添加剂


4 參考文獻
5 外部链接



历史[编辑]
2004年雪佛龙庆祝公司成立125周年。最早，雪佛龙的历史可以追溯到洛杉矶北部的碧可峡谷（现在是碧可峡谷油田）发现原油。这一发现导致了1879年雪佛龙公司最早的前身太平洋海岸石油公司的成立。另外一个前身是于1901年在德州波蒙特一个波纹铁皮建筑物裡的三个屋子中成立的德州燃料公司。该公司看起来很朴素，后来成为闻名的德士古。
雪佛龙集团起初叫加州标准石油，或者简称SoCal，成立于约翰·D·洛克菲勒反垄断拆分期间的1911年。曾是20世纪早期控制美国石油工业的“七姐妹”之一。1933年，沙特阿拉伯赋予加州标准石油探油权，并在1938年发现了原油。1950年代早期，加州标准石油在沙特发现了世界上最大的加瓦尔油田。加州标准石油的子公司，加州-阿拉伯标准石油发展数年后于1944年成为阿拉伯美国石油公司（简称：阿美）。1973年，沙特政府开始收购阿美。到1980年，整个阿美归沙特所有，并于1988年更名为沙特阿拉伯石油公司（简称：沙特阿美）。
加州标准石油于1984年和海湾石油合并，成为当时历史上最大的购并案。在反垄断条例下，加州标准石油剥离了许多海湾石油的子公司，并把海湾石油的加油站和一个设在美国东部的炼油厂出售。加州标准石油更名为雪佛龙集团。[2] 1992年6月，达力智公司（NYSE: DYN）因雪佛龙的天然气和液化天然气业务和达力智的前身Natural Gas Clearinghouse公司（NYSE: NGC）。NGC在1994年成为综合天然气服务公司。[3] 2000年2月1日完成的一项购并案，伊利诺娃公司（NYSE: ILN）成为达力智公司旗下全资子公司，雪佛龙占有其28%的股份。[3]
2001年，雪佛龙集团兼并了德士古成为雪佛龙-德士古。2005年5月9日，雪佛龙德士古宣布放弃德士古一名，重新改回雪佛龙，而德士古依然是雪佛龙集团的一个品牌。2005年8月19日，雪佛龙并购了美国加州联合公司（优尼科），并因为优尼科在东南亚的大量地热开发而成为世界上最大的地热能源商。[4]
雪佛龙于2007年与中国石油天然气集团公司（中石油）签订了一项为期30年的天然气合作开发项目，雪佛龙（优尼科中国东海有限公司）作为作业方占有49%股份，中石油作为甲方占有51%股份。天然气项目位于中国四川省东北部地区（四川省宣汉县和重庆市开县）。项目于2008年组建，2009年开始修井，一开始预计2010年投产。但是这个项目由于各种各样的原因，进展十分缓慢。截至2012年底，没有新钻一口井，新的天然气净化厂也还在建设中（估计完成60%），管道铺设仍在进行中，首气遥遥无期。
新政策和发展[编辑]




雪佛龙在加州费尔罗斯500千瓦光伏项目


雪佛龙已经逐步开始减少温室气体排放，来获得更清洁的能源。[5]在美国的石油公司中，雪佛龙因为在可替代能源方面的巨大投资并定下目标来减少温室气体排放而获得了最高的评价。[5]雪佛龙为全球地热能最大生产商，所产生的能源足可供应给超过七百万家庭使用.[6]
市场品牌[编辑]




2006年前典型的雪佛龙加油站标志.






2006年雪佛龙开始逐步采用的加油站标志


燃油[编辑]

雪佛龙
标准石油 (有限条件)
德士古
加德士
海湾
优尼科
Dinoco

便利店[编辑]

Star Mart
Extra Mile
Redwood Market
Town Pantry

润滑油[编辑]

Delo (sold by Caltex and Chevron)
Havoline (sold by Caltex and Texaco)
Revtex (sold by Caltex)
Ursa (sold by Texaco)

燃油添加剂[编辑]

Techron - Chevron, Texaco (phased in during 2005), Caltex (phased in during 2006 and later)
Techron concentrate plus
Clean System 3 - Texaco (phased out during 2005 in favor of Techron)
PE Purescape

參考文獻[编辑]


^ 1.0 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 4Q11 Earnings Release. Chevron Corporation. 2011-02-24. 
^ Chevron Products Homepage
^ 3.0 3.1 CHEVRON CORP. APPLAUDS DYNEGY-ILLINOVA MERGER 互联网档案馆的存檔，存档日期2007-09-29., Chevron Press Release Archives, February 2, 2000
^ Chevron claims energy debate, BBC News, 2006-02-19  引文格式1维护：日期与年 (link)
^ 5.0 5.1 Quest for clean energy / Chevron, PG&E cited for positive steps to combat global warming
^ Chevron - Chevron Stories










查
论
编


 道琼斯工业平均指数成份股






目前組成股票



3M
蘋果公司
高盛
美國運通
Visa
波音
卡特彼勒
雪佛龍
思科系统
可口可乐公司
杜邦
埃克森美孚
通用电气
耐克
家得宝
英特尔
IBM
强生
摩根大通
麦当劳
默沙东
微软
輝瑞
宝洁
旅行家集團
聯合健康集團
联合技术
威訊
沃尔玛
华特迪士尼








前任組成股票



奧馳亞集團
卡夫食品
美國國際集團
美国烟草公司
花旗集团
通用汽车
伊士曼柯达
固特異
霍尼韦尔
國際紙業公司
北美洲公司
西爾斯羅巴克
美國聯合碳化物
美國橡膠公司
美國鋁業
惠普
AT&T
美國銀行








外部链接[编辑]

官方网站





 
						取自“https://zh.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=雪佛龍&oldid=45380754”					
分类：纽约证券交易所上市公司道瓊斯工業平均指數成份股1879年成立的公司美国石油公司跨国公司美国能源公司加德士隐藏分类：调用重复模板参数的页面Webarchive模板wayback链接引文格式1维护：日期与年使用过时图像语法的页面含有英語的條目维基百科和维基数据上的官方网站不同 



导航菜单


个人工具

没有登录讨论贡献创建账户登录 



命名空间

条目
讨论




不转换



不转换
简体
繁體
大陆简体
香港繁體
澳門繁體
马新简体
台灣正體






视图

阅读
编辑
查看历史



更多







搜索



 







导航


首页分类索引特色内容新闻动态最近更改随机条目 



帮助


帮助维基社群方针与指引互助客栈知识问答字词转换IRC即时聊天联络我们关于维基百科资助维基百科 



在其他项目中


维基共享资源 



打印/导出


下载为PDF 



工具


链入页面相关更改上传文件特殊页面打印页面固定链接页面信息维基数据项引用本页 



其他语言


العربيةAzərbaycancaБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEnglishEspañolEestiفارسیSuomiFrançais客家語/Hak-kâ-ngîעבריתहिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaItaliano日本語Қазақша한국어LatinaLietuviųമലയാളംNederlandsNorsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSimple EnglishSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinarayBân-lâm-gú粵語 
编辑链接 





 本页面最后修订于2017年7月26日 (星期三) 20:02。
本站的全部文字在知识共享 署名-相同方式共享 3.0协议之条款下提供，附加条款亦可能应用。（请参阅使用条款）
Wikipedia®和维基百科标志是维基媒体基金会的注册商标；维基™是维基媒体基金会的商标。
维基媒体基金会是在美国佛罗里达州登记的501(c)(3)免税、非营利、慈善机构。


隐私政策
关于维基百科
免责声明
开发者
Cookie声明
手机版视图



 

 









Texaco - Wikipedia





















 






Texaco

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

For the novel by Patrick Chamoiseau, see Texaco (novel).
Not to be confused with Texico.
"Sky Chief" redirects here. For the 1940s wristwatch, see Benrus.

Texaco, Inc.





Type

Independent company (1901–2000)
Subsidiary (2001–present)


Industry
Oil and gas


Founded
Beaumont, Texas, U.S..
1901; 116 years ago (1901)


Founders
Joseph S. Cullinan
Thomas J. Donoghue
Walter Benona Sharp
Arnold Schlaet


Headquarters
San Ramon, California, U.S.



Number of locations

2,000+ (2006 estimate)[1]



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

John S. Watson (Chairman & CEO)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas and other petrochemicals


Parent
Chevron Corporation


Website
texaco.com
chevronwithtechron.com


Texaco, Inc. ("The Texas Company") is an American oil subsidiary of Chevron Corporation. Its flagship product is its fuel "Texaco with Techron". It also owns the Havoline motor oil brand. Texaco was an independent company until its refining operations merged into Chevron Corporation in 2001, at which time most of its station franchises were divested to the Shell Oil Company. It began as the Texas Fuel Company, founded in 1901 in Beaumont, Texas, by Joseph S. Cullinan, Thomas J. Donoghue, Walter Benona Sharp, and Arnold Schlaet upon the discovery of oil at Spindletop.
For many years, Texaco was the only company selling gasoline under the same brand name in all 50 US states, as well as Canada, making it the most truly national brand among its competitors. It was also one of the Seven Sisters which dominated the global petroleum industry from the mid-1940s to the 1970s. Its current logo features a white star in a red circle (a reference to the lone star of Texas), leading to the long-running advertising jingles "You can trust your car to the man who wears the star" and "Star of the American Road."[citation needed] The company was headquartered in Harrison, New York, near White Plains, prior to the merger with Chevron.
Texaco gasoline comes with Techron, an additive developed by Chevron, as of 2005, replacing the previous CleanSystem3. The Texaco brand is strong in the U.S., Latin America and West Africa. It has a presence in Europe as well; for example, it is a well-known retail brand in the UK, with around 1,100 Texaco-branded service stations.[citation needed]



Contents


1 History

1.1 1901–38: Beginnings
1.2 1939–63: The Texas Company to Texaco, Inc.
1.3 1964–98: Various ventures
1.4 1999–present: Chevron Corporation


2 Corporate headquarters
3 In popular culture
4 Sponsorships
5 Environmental issues
6 See also
7 References
8 External links



History[edit]




Gippsland Motor Garage, Old Gippstown, with 1930s Texaco gasoline pump and signage






Antique Texaco advertising, Gippsland Motor Garage, Old Gippstown


1901–38: Beginnings[edit]




1939 Texaco tanker truck by Dodge on display at the Henry Ford Museum.


Texaco was founded in Beaumont, Texas as the Texas Fuel Company in 1901. In 1905, it established an operation in Antwerp, Belgium, under the name Continental Petroleum Company, which it acquired control of in 1913.[2] The next year, Texaco moved to new offices in Houston on the corner of San Jacinto and Rusk. In 1928, Texaco became the first U.S. oil company to sell its gasoline nationwide under one single brand name in all 48 states (50 states after Alaska and Hawaii joined the Union in 1959).
In 1931, Texaco purchased Indian Oil Company, based in Illinois. This expanded Texaco's refining and marketing base in the Midwest and also gave Texaco the rights to Indian's Havoline motor oil, which became a Texaco product. The next year, Texaco introduced Fire Chief gasoline nationwide, a so-called "super-octane" motor fuel touted as meeting or exceeding government standards for gasoline for fire engines and other emergency vehicles.[3] It was promoted through a radio program over NBC hosted by Ed Wynn, called the Texaco Fire Chief.
In 1936, the Texas Corporation purchased the Barco oil concession in Colombia, and formed a joint venture with Socony-Vacuum, now Mobil, to develop it. Over the next three years the company engaged in a highly challenging project to drill wells and build a pipeline to the coast across mountains and then through uncharted swamps and jungles.[4] During this time, Texaco also illegally supplied the fascist Gen. Franco faction in Spanish Civil War, despite a federal fine, with a total 3,500,000 barrels (560,000 m3) of oil.[5]
Also in 1936, marketing operations east of Suez (including Asia, East Africa, and Australasia) were placed into a joint venture with Standard Oil Company of California – Socal (Chevron) under the brand name Caltex, in exchange for Socal placing its Bahrain refinery and Arabian oilfields into the venture. The next year, Texaco commissioned industrial designer Walter Dorwin Teague to develop a modern service station design.
In 1938, Texaco introduced Sky Chief gasoline, a premium fuel developed from the ground up as a high-octane gasoline rather than just an ethylized regular product. In 1939, Texaco became one of the first oil companies to introduce a "Registered Rest Room" program to ensure that restroom facilities at all Texaco stations nationwide maintained a standard level of cleanliness to the motoring public.
1939–63: The Texas Company to Texaco, Inc.[edit]




A Texaco fuel station in Miami Beach, Florida






A Texaco fuel dispenser in United Kingdom


After the onset of World War II in 1939, Texaco's rogue CEO, Torkild Rieber, an admirer of Hitler, hired pro-Nazi assistants who cabled Berlin “coded information about ships leaving New York for Britain and what their cargoes were.” This espionage easily enabled Hitler to destroy the ships.[6] In 1940, Rieber was forced to resign when his connections with German Nazism, and his illegal supply of oil to the fascist forces during the Spanish Civil War were made public by the Herald Tribune through information produced by British Security Coordination.[7][8][9] During the war, Texaco ranked 93rd among United States corporations in the value of military production contracts.[10] In 1947, Caltex expanded to include Texaco's European marketing operations. That same year, Texaco merged its British operation with Trinidad Leaseholds under the name Regent; it gained full control of Regent in 1956,[11] but the Regent brand remained in use until 1968-9. In 1954, the company added the detergent additive Petrox to its "Sky Chief" gasoline, which was also souped up with higher octane to meet the antiknock needs of new cars with high-compression engines. The next year, Texaco became the sole sponsor of The Huntley-Brinkley Report on NBC-TV. In 1959, the Texas Company changed its corporate name to Texaco, Inc. to better reflect the value of the Texaco brand name, which represented the biggest selling gasoline brand in the U.S. and only marketer selling gasoline under one brand name in all 50 states. It also acquired McColl-Frontenac Oil Company Ltd. of Canada and changes its name to Texaco Canada Limited.[12] Around this time, Paragon Oil, a major fuel oil distribution company in the northeastern U.S, was acquired.
1964–98: Various ventures[edit]




Texaco fuel station in Poá (São Paulo), Brazil


In 1964, Texaco introduced the "Matawan" service station design at a station in Matawan, New Jersey.[13] Two years later, Texaco replaced the long-running banjo sign with a new hexagon logo that had previously been test-marketed with the "Matawan" station design introduced two years earlier. The new logo featured a red outline with TEXACO in black bold lettering and a small banjo logo with a red star and green T at bottom. The following year, the Regent name was replaced by Texaco at British petrol stations.[14] In 1970, in response to increasingly stringent federal emission standards that would ultimately lead to the mandating of unleaded gasoline in 1975 and later-model cars and trucks, Texaco introduced lead-free Texaco as the first regular-octane lead-free gasoline at stations in the Los Angeles area and throughout Southern California. Lead-free Texaco became available nationwide in 1974. On November 20, 1980, the Lake Peigneur/Jefferson Island disaster occurred. Two years later, a new service station design was introduced. Several product names were also changed with the advent of self-service including Lead-free Texaco to Texaco Unleaded, Fire Chief to Texaco Regular, and Super Lead-free Sky Chief to Texaco Super Unleaded.
In 1982, Texaco Canada Limited merged with Texaco Explorations Canada Limited to form Texaco Canada Incorporated,[12] with head offices in Toronto.




Texaco station in Kendall, Washington


On November 19, 1985, Pennzoil won a US$10.53 billion verdict against Texaco in the largest civil verdict in US history. This was due to the fact that Texaco established a signed contract to buy Getty Oil after Pennzoil entered into an unsigned, yet still binding, buyout contract with Gordon Getty. In 1987, Texaco filed for bankruptcy. It was the largest in U.S. history until 2001.[15]
In January 1989, Texaco and Saudi Aramco agreed to form a joint venture known as Star Enterprise in which Saudi Aramco would own a 50% share of Texaco's refining and marketing operations in the eastern U.S. and Gulf Coast.[16] In 1989, Texaco introduced System3 gasolines in all three grades of fuel, featuring the latest detergent additive technology to improve performance by reducing deposits that clog fuel injection systems. Toronto-based Texaco Canada Incorporated was sold to Imperial Oil with all Texaco Canada retail operations converted to Esso brand. Two years later, the company was awarded the National Medal of Arts.[17] In 1991, non retail Canadian operations became Texaco Canada Petroleum Incorporated with head office in Calgary, Alberta. In 1993, several dozen tribal leaders and residents from the Ecuadoran Amazon filed a billion-dollar class-action lawsuit against Texaco, as a result of massive ecological pollution of the area and rivers around Texaco's Ecuadorian offshore drilling sites, causing toxic contamination of approximately 30,000 residents.[18]
In 1994, Texaco's System3 gasolines were replaced by new CleanSystem3 gasoline for improved engine performance. In 1995, Texaco merged its Danish and Norwegian downstream operations with those of Norsk Hydro under the new brand HydroTexaco. This joint venture was sold in 2007 to Norwegian retail interests as YX Energi, following the purchase of Hydro by Statoil. In 1996, Texaco paid over $170 million to settle racial discrimination lawsuits filed by black employees at the company. It was the largest racial discrimination lawsuit settlement in the U.S. at the time, and was particularly damaging to Texaco's public relations when tapes were released containing ethnic slurs used repeatedly by company officers at high-level corporate meetings.
1999–present: Chevron Corporation[edit]




A Texaco station in Watauga, Texas, taken on 28 April 2016.






A Texaco station in Lewisville, Texas, taken on June 10, 2017.


In 1999, the company formed the joint venture Equilon with Shell Oil Company, combining their Western and Midwestern U.S. refining and marketing.[19] This gave rise to the 2006 U.S. Supreme Court antitrust case of Texaco Inc. v. Dagher, which cleared both Texaco and Shell of any antitrust liability concerning the pricing of Equilon's gasoline. That same year, another joint venture, Motiva, was formed with Shell Oil Company and Saudi Aramco in which the Star Enterprise operations were merged with the Eastern and Gulf Coast U.S. refining and marketing operations of Shell.[19] On February 8, 2002 Chevron Corporation merged with Texaco and Shell purchased Texaco's interest in the Equilon and Motiva joint ventures.[20] Shell began converting its Texaco stations to the Shell brand the next year.[21] In July 2004, Chevron regained non-exclusive rights to the Texaco brand name in the U.S.[22] The following year, in August, Texaco introduced the Techron additive into its fuels in the U.S. and parts of Latin America.[23] In 2007, Delek Benelux took over marketing activities for Chevron in Benelux, including 869 filling stations, mostly under the Texaco brand.[24] Chevron Corporation also sold its Conoco stations in Mississippi to the Texaco brand name. Texaco Canada Petroleum Incorporated was dissolved in 2008 with Texaco exiting from the Canadian market. In 2010 Texaco ended retail operations in the Mid-Atlantic US, removing their brand from 450 stations in Delaware, Indiana, Kentucky, North Carolina, New Jersey, Maryland, Ohio, Pennsylvania, Virginia, West Virginia, Washington, D.C.[25]
Corporate headquarters[edit]
Prior to the merger, Texaco's headquarters, a 750,000-square-foot (70,000 m2) building, were in Harrison, New York, near White Plains.[26][27][28] In 2002, Chevron sold the former Texaco headquarters to Morgan Stanley. Morgan Stanley bought the building and the surrounding 107 acres (0.43 km2) for $42 million.[26]
Texaco leased 14 floors of the Chrysler Building in Midtown Manhattan, New York City in the 1930s. As part of the leasing agreement with Texaco the building opened the Cloud Club, a restaurant area for executives. Texaco moved to Westchester County, New York, in 1977. This contributed to the closure of the Cloud Club in 1979.[29]
In popular culture[edit]
A location was used in the opening scene of Cheech & Chong's Next Movie at 6407 West Sunset Boulevard in Los Angeles, California, where the main characters Cheech and Chong siphon gasoline from a tow truck. A Jack in the Box now stands at that location.
In Back to the Future and Back to the Future Part II, a Texaco station in the center of Hill Valley is shown in 1955, 1985, and 2015.
Sponsorships[edit]




Racing driver Nigel Mansell driving in the 1993 CART IndyCar World Series






Kenny Irwin Jr. driving in the 1998 NASCAR Winston Cup






The No.7 Eggenberger Motorsport Ford Sierra RS500 of Klaus Ludwig and Klaus Niedzwiedz. Eggenberger Motorsport won the 1987 WTCC Entrants Championship


Texaco is associated with the Havoline brand of motor oil and other automotive products. It was one of the sponsors of NASCAR with many drivers, such as Davey Allison, Ernie Irvan, Dale Jarrett; Kenny Irwin, Jr.; Ricky Rudd, Jamie McMurray, Casey Mears, and Juan Pablo Montoya. Texaco recently sponsored the #42 Dodge driven by Montoya. Havoline continuously sponsored a car from the early 1980s to 2008. At the end of the 2008 season, Texaco / Havoline officially ended their sponsorship with NASCAR and Chip Ganassi Racing. This brought to a close a 20+-year relationship with the sport.
Texaco has also been involved in open wheel racing, sponsoring the Texaco Grand Prix of Houston along with sponsoring drivers like Indianapolis 500 winner Mario Andretti and his son Michael.
In Formula One, Texaco sponsored the Team Lotus in 1972 and 1973, and McLaren from 1974 to 1978. The company returned to Grand Prix racing at a smaller scale in 1997, with their brands appearing on the Stewart SF01 car. Their association with the team and its successor, Jaguar Racing, continued until the end of 2001.
Texaco sponsored the Tom Walkinshaw Racing Rover Vitesse factory team at the 1985 and 1986 European Touring Car Championship (ETCC) under their Bastos brand, and the Ford Sierra RS500 factory cars entered by Eggenberger Motorsport in the 1987 World Touring Car Championship (plus the 1988 ETCC and other European-based championships). Texaco also sponsored cars in the 1987 World Rally Championship.
From 1987-1993, Texaco was the major sponsor (through their Australian Caltex offshoot) Colin Bond Racing in Australian touring car racing, first with the Alfa Romeo 75 turbo in 1987, then the Ford Sierra RS500 from 1988-1992 and then Toyota's in 1993. From 2000 until 2007, it was title sponsor of Stone Brothers Racing with Russell Ingall winning the 2005 championship. In 2016, Caltex became title sponsor of the Triple Eight Race Engineering car of Craig Lowndes, having previously been an associate sponsor of the team.
Texaco was long associated with the Metropolitan Opera as sole sponsor of its radio broadcasts for 63 years. It was identified as well with such entertainment legends as Bob Hope, Jack Benny and Milton Berle (many of their shows were originally sponsored by Texaco – see Texaco Star Theatre, which includes the sponsorship lyrics of the opening theme: "We're the men of Texaco, We work from Maine to Mexico..."). Berle's program was broadcast in the same time slot as Fulton J. Sheen's religious program for a while, thus leading to Berle's oft-quoted quip, "We both have the same boss – Sky Chief!"
From 1984 to 1998, Texaco were the title sponsors of the main One Day International cricket tournament in England, the Texaco Trophy. It also sponsored the Texaco Cup, a football tournament for clubs of the British Isles.
Environmental issues[edit]
Main article: Lago Agrio oil field
From 1965–1993, Texaco participated in a consortium to develop the Lago Agrio oil field in Ecuador. It has been accused of extensive environmental damage from these operations, and faces legal claims from both private plaintiffs and the government of Ecuador. The case has been widely publicized by environmental activists and is the subject of Crude, a 2009 documentary film by Joe Berlinger. Chevron claims that it is being unfairly targeted as a deep pocket defendant, when the actual responsibility lies with the government and its national oil company, Petroecuador.[citation needed]
The NiMH chemistry used in modern hybrid vehicles was invented by ECD Ovonics founder, Stan Ovshinksy, and Dr. Masahiko Oshitani of the Yuasa Company[30][31] In 1994, General Motors acquired a controlling interest in Ovonics's battery development and manufacturing. On October 10, 2001, Texaco purchased GM's share in GM Ovonics, and Chevron completed its acquisition of Texaco six days later. In 2003, Texaco Ovonics Battery Systems was restructured into Cobasys, a 50/50 joint venture between Chevron and Energy Conversion Devices (ECD) Ovonics.[32] Chevron's influence over Cobasys extends beyond a strict 50/50 joint venture. Chevron holds a 19.99% interest in ECD Ovonics.[33] In addition, Chevron maintains the right to seize all of Cobasys' intellectual property rights in the event that ECD Ovonics does not fulfill its contractual obligations.[34] On September 10, 2007, Chevron filed a legal claim that ECD Ovonics has not fulfilled its obligations. ECD Ovonics disputes this claim.[35] Since that time, the arbitration hearing was repeatedly suspended while the parties negotiate with an unknown prospective buyer. No agreement has been reached with the potential buyer.[36] Cobasys's patents relating to NiMH batteries expired in 2015.
In Plug-in Hybrids: The Cars that Will Recharge America, published in February 2007, Sherry Boschert argues that large-format NiMH batteries are commercially viable but that Cobasys refuses to sell or license them to small companies or individuals.[37] Boschert argues that Cobasys accepts only very large orders for these batteries. When Boschert conducted her research, major auto makers showed little interest in large orders for large-format NiMH batteries. However, Toyota employees complained about the difficulty in getting smaller orders of large format NiMH batteries to service the existing 825 RAV-4EVs. Because no other companies were willing to make large orders, Cobasys was not manufacturing nor licensing any large format NiMH battery technology for automotive purposes. Boschert concludes that "it's possible that Cobasys (Chevron) is squelching all access to large NiMH batteries through its control of patent licenses in order to remove a competitor to gasoline. Or it's possible that Cobasys simply wants the market for itself and is waiting for a major automaker to start producing plug-in hybrids or electric vehicles."[38]
In an interview with the Economist, Ovshinsky subscribed to the former view. "I think we at ECD we made a mistake of having a joint venture with an oil company, frankly speaking. And I think it’s not a good idea to go into business with somebody whose strategies would put you out of business, rather than building the business.[39]"
In December 2006, Cobasys and General Motors announced that they had signed a contract under which Cobasys provides NiMH batteries for the Saturn Aura hybrid sedan.[40] In March 2007, GM announced that it would use Cobasys NiMH batteries in the 2008 Chevrolet Malibu hybrid as well.
In October 2007, International Acquisitions Services, Inc. and Innovative Transportation Systems AG filed suit against Cobasys and its parents for refusing to fill a large, previously agreed-upon order for large-format NiMH batteries to be used in the electric Innovan.[36]
In August 2008, Mercedes-Benz U.S. International Inc. filed suit against Cobasys claiming that Cobasys isn’t delivering the batteries it agreed to build for Mercedes-Benz’s planned hybrid SUV.[41]
Cobasys was sold[42] in 2009 to SB Li Motive, which is a joint venture formed by Bosch and Samsung to develop lithium ion batteries for automotive applications. The sale price was not disclosed. The German-Korean company will integrate Cobasys as the North American branch of the company. Cobasys will supply batteries to the new Mercedes ML450 hybrid.
See also[edit]


Hudson Valley portal
Texas portal
Companies portal
Energy portal



Chevron Corporation
Caltex – joint venture between Texaco and Chevron, now a major international brand name of Chevron Corporation


References[edit]


^ "History of Texaco - Texaco With Techron". 
^ News of the Week: Union Oil of Delaware, Business Digest and Investment Weekly, Volume 26, Issue 5, Arthur Fremont Rider (editor), 1920, p. 95 (retrieved August 2, 2010 from Google Books)
^ "Depend on the Gasoline Fire Engines Depend On! Texaco Fire Chief Super-Octane Gasoline," Albany Democrat-Herald, May 27, 1932, pg. 4. (Ad.)
^ "U.S. Business Opens the Great New Barco Oil Fields in Colombia". LIFE. Time Inc. 7 (20): 15ff. 1939-11-13. ISSN 0024-3019. Retrieved 2013-07-24. 
^ Tierney, Dominic (2007). "American Men, American Oil, American Arms". FDR and the Spanish Civil War: neutrality and commitment in the struggle that divided America. Duke University Press. p. 68. Retrieved June 11, 2010. 
^ "‘Spain in Our Hearts,’ by Adam Hochschild," Book Review by Michael Kazin, New York Times, March 29, 2016.
^ Dominic Tierney (2007). FDR and the Spanish Civil War: neutrality and commitment in the struggle that divided America (in French). p. 68. ISBN 978-0-8223-4076-8. 
^ Noam Chomsky (2001). Understanding Power (PDF). p. 159, Chapter 5 footnotes 61–64. ISBN 1-56584-703-2. 
^ The Secret History of British Intelligence in the Americas, 1940-1945 pp56-57
^ Peck, Merton J. & Scherer, Frederic M. The Weapons Acquisition Process: An Economic Analysis (1962) Harvard Business School p.619
^ Report by the Monopolies Commission on the Supply of Petrol to Retailers in the United Kingdom, 1965
^ a b Texaco Canada Inc
^ Texaco: Service Stations, accessed November 23, 2006
^ "News and Views: Regent become Texaco". Autocar. Vol. 127 no. 3746. November 30, 1967. p. 48. 
^ "Largest corporate bankruptcies" (PDF). Bankruptcydata.com. 
^ "Saudi-Texaco Joint Venture". The New York Times. January 3, 1989. p. 11. Retrieved June 10, 2009. 
^ Lifetime Honors – National Medal of Arts
^ "Why A Lawsuit?". Archived from the original on Dec 2, 2007. Retrieved June 11, 2010. 
^ a b Aspects of the Refining/Marketing Joint Ventures of Shell Oil, Star Enterprises, and Texaco, Retrieved on June 10, 2009.
^ "Shell to brand new U.S. gas stations". Houston Business Journal. February 8, 2002. 
^ Nerad, Jack (May 8, 2002). "Trust Your Car to the Man who Wears the... Shell". Driving Today. Retrieved March 24, 2009. 
^ "ChevronTexaco Welcomes Back the Texaco Retail Brand in the U.S." (Press release). ChevronTexaco. Jul 1, 2004. 
^ https://web.archive.org/web/20081026092940/http://www.texaco.com/about/news_press_081505.asp. Archived from the original on October 26, 2008. Retrieved June 12, 2009.  Missing or empty |title= (help)
^ Delek Petroleum, Ltd.
^ "Eastern Withdrawal for Chevron". December 7, 2009. 
^ a b Brenner, Elsa. "IN BUSINESS; Morgan Stanley Seals Deal on Texaco Headquarters." The New York Times. Sunday March 31, 2002. Retrieved on October 3, 2009.
^ "Harrison village, New York." U.S. Census Bureau. Retrieved on October 3, 2009.
^ "Contact Us." at the Wayback Machine (archived December 5, 1998) Texaco. December 5, 1998. Retrieved on October 3, 2009.
^ McGrath, Charles. "A Lunch Club for the Higher-Ups". The New York Times. May 26, 2005. Retrieved on September 19, 2014.
^ Olvera, Jennifer (07/03/2008). "5 Things You Need to Know About Nickel-Metal-Hybrid Batteries". GreenCar.com. Archived from the original on January 26, 2009.  Check date values in: |date= (help)
^ "Stanford Ovshinsky : Amorphous semiconductor materials". Inventor of the Week. March 2000. 
^ Roberson, J. (March 14, 2007) "Supplier Cobasys exploring more hybrid batteries" Detroit Free Press
^ ECD Ovonics Definitive Proxy Statement of January 15, 2003
^ ECD Ovonics Amended General Statement of Beneficial Ownership of December 2, 2004
^ ECD Ovonics 10-Q Quarterly Report for the period ending September 30, 2007
^ a b ECD Ovonics 10-Q Quarterly Report for the period ending March 31, 2008
^ http://www.newsociety.com/bookid/3934
^ Boschert, S (2007). Plug-in Hybrids: The Cars that Will Recharge America. Gabriola Island, BC: New Society Publishers. ISBN 978-0-86571-571-4. 
^ Greenberg, Joel (October 14, 2008). "The Edison of our Age: Stan Ovshinsky and the Future of Energy [Video Interview Part 1]". The Energy Roadmap. 
^ Abuelsamid, S. (December 6, 2006) "Cobasys providing NiMH batteries for Saturn Aura hybrid" Autobloggreen.com
^ "Mercedes sues Cobasys over battery deal" Automotive News Europe
^ Abuelsamid, Sam (2009-07-27). "Bosch-Samsung battery venture buys Cobasys". green.autoblog.com. Retrieved August 15, 2011. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Texaco.



Official website
Texaco Car of the Decades
Texaco Xpress Lube
Havoline
Chevron
Regent
World Internet News: "Big Oil Looking for a Government Handout," April 2006.
Texaco Alumni Site







v
t
e


Chevron Corporation



Petroleum brands



Caltex
Chevron
Citgo
Texaco





Technology



Clarity
Delo
Havoline
Techron





Acquisition



Unocal Corporation
Texaco, Inc





Related



Petroleum Industry
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Supermajor










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Texaco&oldid=793109040"					
Categories: TexacoOil companies of the United StatesChemical companies of the United StatesAutomotive companies of the United StatesAutomotive fuel brandsGas stations in the United StatesCompanies based in Beaumont, TexasCompanies based in San Ramon, CaliforniaAmerican companies established in 1901Energy companies established in 1901Non-renewable resource companies established in 19011901 establishments in TexasPetroleum in TexasPeabody Award winnersUnited States National Medal of Arts recipientsChevron Corporation brandsFormer components of the Dow Jones Industrial AverageSuperfund sites in CaliforniaHidden categories: CS1 French-language sources (fr)Pages with citations lacking titlesPages with citations having bare URLsWebarchive template wayback linksCS1 errors: datesPages using deprecated image syntaxAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from October 2009Articles with unsourced statements from January 2013Articles with unsourced statements from October 2015 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةČeštinaDeutschEspañolفارسیFrançais한국어ItalianoქართულიLatinaNederlands日本語Norsk nynorskPolskiPortuguêsSlovenčinaSuomiSvenskaไทยУкраїнська中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 30 July 2017, at 18:03.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 







The Chevron Market - 首頁 | Facebook












Facebook電子郵件或電話密碼忘記帳號？註冊首頁關於活動相片按讚分析Instagram feed影片貼文建立粉絲專頁社群5,522 人說這讚5,422 個人正在追蹤關於查看全部+61 408 905 405www.facebook.com/TheChevronMarket社群用戶5,522 個讚更多大家都按讚的專頁Yarraville Markets產品／服務Markets and Community活動All for Kids Market地標和名勝古蹟此專頁按讚的粉絲專頁Tabatha's Treasure TroveLittle Kids SportsEverli Creations.中文(台灣) · English (US) · Español · Português (Brasil) · Français (France)隱私政策 · 使用條款 · 廣告 · Ad Choices · Cookie · 更多 Facebook © 2017相片顯示全部影片Want to see what's coming to The Chevron Market 
Sunday December 13th ? Take a look here feel free to tag and share xo3551查看全部貼文The Chevron Market 分享了 Good Housekeeping 的影片。 · 7月31日 5:16 · how funny - how many times the paper towel one has happened to me :)This Is the Definition of Type-A Torture由 Good Housekeeping 張貼21,759,140 次觀看21,759,140 次觀看Good Housekeeping · 5月16日 · Good luck getting through this entire video without LOSING it.  Restore your Type-A sanity here: http://ghkp.us/1aA94MtThe Chevron Market 分享了 body+soul 的相片。 · 7月24日 4:12 · I LOVE THISbody+soul · 7月22日 0:00 · Lucky you can do this yoga routine at home http://bit.ly/2tMau9i顯示全部貼文The Chevron Market 新增了 36 張相片。 · 7月23日 15:49 · Thank You to Marlene Sayson who always captures the talent at Chevron- her work is outstanding and we love her to bits- this is only a snippet of our July Market Stalls  OK - Full Steam Ahead- If you sent through an expression of interest for the Christmas Market- keep a look out this week in inboxes as I will be sending out acceptance offers!還有 33 張The Chevron Market 分享了 Tiny Tables and Chairs 的相片。 · 7月14日 23:56 · Hey Mums- OPPORTUNITY-Tiny Tables and Chairs · 7月14日 21:25 · BUSINESS FOR SALE: After over 8 years of setting up and owning this wonderful small business, I have decided to put it up for sale. I am in search of a person, ⋯⋯couple, partnership or family who have similar values to me and can put more time into all areas including marketing via social media. This business can be intergrated into another in the party industry or run like I have as a stand alone party hire service, which I have sucessfully run from home. Ideally I would like the business to remain in the Western Suburbs of Melbourne to service all of my lovely customers here, thou I do deliver and have customers all over Melbourne. I have always prided myself on fantastic customer service and also maintaining the highest quality of all of my hire items. I will assist any future owner through transition and impart all of my knowledge of party hire and future trends/ideas. My family and I are at the very start of transitioning to a more relaxed and rural lifestyle. Please note that all bookings now and in the future will be fulfilled and at the quoted price given. We are not closing the business at all. Also I am selling the business as a whole so it gives the new owner the best opportunity for success, so please don't contact me for sale of individual items. All expressions of interest are to be ONLY EMAILED please to me at sonia@tinytablesandchairs.com.au and a meeting to discuss will be coordinated. Many Thanks Sonia 🎈 更多The Chevron Market 分享了 Once Upon A Fairy-Tale Day 的貼文。 · 7月12日 15:10 · $2 from every ticket sold will be donated to  Team Johnson Tarneit This event will be held in the same area as  The Chevron Market - September 24th 2017  School Holiday Fun -tickets can be purchased from the following booking site - Face Painting, Photo booth and Terry the T Rex Dinosaur! ⋯⋯ https://once-upon-a-fairy-tale.myshopify.com/ 更多還有 2 張Once Upon A Fairy-Tale Day 新增了 5 張相片。 · 7月12日 13:12 · Have you booked your tickets to the next school holidays fun session ? Sept 24th!  Face Painting , Photo booth & Terry The T-Rex ! $2 from every ticket sold going to Team Johnson Tarneit See you there !  https://once-upon-a-fairy-tale.myshopify.com/The Chevron Market · 7月9日 18:47 · THANK YOU!  Another wonderful day filled with creative goodness and loads of families through! What a Winter Market! It's finally time to open Expressions of Interest for our Christmas Market Sunday December 10th, 2017.  Email only to ----------> chevronmarket@gmail.comThe Chevron Market · 7月8日 15:34 · Repost-TODAY IS THE DAY - We open at 10-2pm...Indoor & Undercover, Free Onsite Parking , Cash Out Facilities, Food & Beverages, Fantaboulous Stalls, Free Kids Entertainment, Free Face Painting & More ! Come and see why we are #bestmarketinthewest - It's Chevron Day! #mumsrockbusiness #chevronmarket #experiencewyndham #marketsforkids #marketsinmelbourne #madeinmelbourneThe Chevron Market 分享了貼文。 · 7月7日 18:14 · One more sleep !‎The Chevron Market‎ 加入 The Chevron Market · 7月7日 18:13 · COFFEE - and their super gorgeous stall  The Teeny Rabbit will be ready for your morning pick up!The Chevron Market · 7月7日 17:07 · Fathers Day Magnets are here nice and early- get organised mummas !  Find them at one of our most sort after stall  holders @twolittlepirateskids this Sunday July 9th, at The Chevron Market! #twolittlepirates #chevronlove #chevronmarket #bestmarketinthewest #madebymums #mumsinbusiness #bestmarketinmelbourne #bestmarketinthewest #melbournemarkets #kidsmarkets #marketlife #fathersdaymagnetsThe Chevron Market 分享了貼文。 · 7月7日 3:01 · YUM! Pick up your Toasted Sandwich from The Smoothie Truck! Sunday 9th July at Chevron!‎The Chevron Market‎ 加入 The Chevron Market · 7月7日 2:59 · Attention Stall Holders  & Customers! If you need your breakfast fix before we open head over to @The Smoothie Truck and pick up a delicious toasted sanga !  Customers if you're so excited to get to Chevron that you miss breakfast- its all good we have it covered!The Chevron Market · 7月7日 1:06 · Finallllly an entire stall dedicated to Play Dough ! @doh_re_mi  is joining the Chevron Market this  Sun 9th July , a local mum make sure you check this funky new stall holder out! #doremiplaydough #chevronmarket #mumsinbusiness #supportlocal #supportsmallbusinesses #bestmarketinthewest #wyndhammarkets #kidsplayThe Chevron Market · 7月6日 19:12 · @anroldesigns  return with so much personalised goodness - check these Bickie and Cake tins out ! Sun July 9 at The Chevron Market ! #anroldesigns #chevronmarket #mumsinbusiness #personaliseddecor #madeinmelbourne #bestmarketinthewest #marketfood #marketsforkids #marketsinmelbourne #whatsoninmelbourne #greatgiftideasThe Chevron Market 分享了 The Beauty Spot 的貼文。 · 7月6日 15:29 · Want to meet a mum who is rockin business?! The Beauty Spot is so phenomenal she even has her own lipstick shade 💪👊👏 come and see for yourself why not only her business is soaring but why we love her !The Beauty Spot 新增了 4 張相片。 · 7月3日 20:38 · APPEARING LIVE WITH TESTERS & STOCK😍Chevron Market this Sunday 9th July!  10am-2pm 601 Heaths Rd Werribee FREE Face painting!⋯⋯ FREE Animal farm! Pop in and let's play make up! Pre order and pick upon the day to save postage! Come bring your favourite lippies for me to colour match 👍🏻 XOXO Jacqui www.senegence.com/thebeautyspot 更多The Chevron Market · 7月6日 4:53 · @soapcuisine creates beautiful handmade rustic soap,scented with Essential Oils, coloured with  Australian Organic clays, Natural Food colours,herbs and spices.  Totally Free from Sulphates, Parabens & Preservatives. Market Goodness ! #chevronmarket #soapcusine #naturalsoap #madeinmelbourne #bestmarketinmelbourne #bestmarketinthewest #experiencewyndham #wyndham #wyndhammarkets #getclosetonature #essentialoilsThe Chevron Market · 7月5日 21:12 · Check out these Scooter Pouches handmade by @needlenthreads -awesome for walks to the park ..finally somewhere to hang their drink bottles! #whatwilltheythinkofnext #scooterpouch #madebyhandinmelbourne #chevronlove #chevronmarket #areyougoingtochevronmarket #wyndhammarkets #marketsforkids #marketlife #needlesandthreads #whatagreatidea #bestmarketinthewestThe Chevron Market · 7月5日 16:42 · @scarlett.tippy.toes  will be at  The Chevron Market this Sun 9th July with her shoes and socks to keep the wee ones toes warm & fashionable this winter! #kidsshoes #mumsinbusiness #bestmarketinthewest #wyndhammarkets #chevronlove #scarletttippytoes #kidsfashioninmelbourne #kidsfashion #melbournekids #marketlife #melbournekidsmarkets查看更多






	
    Environment, Health, and Safety | Chevron Phillips Chemical



















































































Toggle navigation














Toggle search









Search this site












Contact UsCredit InquirySDSTDSLogin












                                        OK
                                    


















Chevron Phillips ChemicalEnvironment, Health & SafetyEnvironment, Health, and Safety




 Print
                            













Page Image






Page ContentEnvironment, Health, and Safety  
Our company creates products and services that make life better for people around the world - both today and tomorrow. As a matter of policy, Chevron Phillips Chemical strives to manufacture, handle, transport and dispose of its chemical products 100 percent safely. Plus, we work with our customers, carriers, suppliers, distributors and contractors to encourage them to comply with our safety and environmental codes.  
We strive to conduct our business in a safe, injury free and environmentally responsible manner. We demonstrate our values by our actions, conducting our business in an ethical way by adhering to the following principles:
To provide timely information that serves to improve public understanding about the safety of chemicals; 
To assure that our chemical products provide their intended benefits while protecting human health and the ecosystem; 
To actively participate in common sense advocacy efforts, chemical testing programs and children’s health initiatives. 
To search for a Material Safety Data Sheet (MSDS), click here.
Page Content 2



Page Image 2













































Chevron Corporation - Wikipedia






















 






Chevron Corporation

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search

This article is about the oil company mostly in Americas. For similarly named companies, see Chevron.

Chevron Corporation


Logo in use since 2006[1]




Chevron's headquarters complex in San Ramon, California




Type

Public


Traded as



NYSE: CVX
DJIA Component
S&P 100 Component
S&P 500 Component





ISIN
US1667641005


Industry
Oil and gas


Predecessor
Standard Oil of California
Gulf Oil[2]


Founded
June 19, 1879 as Pacific Coast Oil Company
June 23, 1984 as Chevron Corporation (now defunct)


Headquarters
San Ramon, California, U.S.



Area served

Worldwide



Key people

John S. Watson (Chairman & CEO)


Products
Petroleum, natural gas and other petrochemicals, See Chevron products


Revenue
 US$ 114.472 billion (2016)[3]



Operating income

 US$-2.16 billion (2016)[3]



Net income

 US$-497 million (2016)[3]


Total assets
 US$266.02 billion (2016)[3]


Total equity
 US$155.02 billion (2016)[3]



Number of employees

61,500 (2016)[4]


Subsidiaries
Texaco, Inc, Skil


Website
Chevron.com


Chevron Corporation (NYSE: CVX) is an American multinational energy corporation. One of the successor companies of Standard Oil, it is headquartered in San Ramon, California, and active in more than 180 countries. Chevron is engaged in every aspect of the oil, natural gas, and geothermal energy industries, including hydrocarbon exploration and production; refining, marketing and transport; chemicals manufacturing and sales; and power generation. Chevron is one of the world's largest oil companies; as of 2014[update], it ranked third in the Fortune 500 list of the top US closely held and public corporations and sixteenth on the Fortune Global 500 list of the top 500 corporations worldwide.[5][6] It was also one of the Seven Sisters that dominated the global petroleum industry from the mid-1940s to the 1970s.
Chevron's downstream operations manufacture and sell products such as fuels, lubricants, additives and petrochemicals. The company's most significant areas of operations are the west coast of North America, the U.S. Gulf Coast, Southeast Asia, South Korea, Australia and South Africa. In 2010, Chevron sold an average 3.1 million barrels per day (490×103 m3/d) of refined products like gasoline, diesel and jet fuel.
Chevron's alternative energy operations include geothermal, solar, wind power, biofuel, fuel cells, and hydrogen. In 2011–2013, the company planned to spend at least $2 billion on research and acquisition of renewable power ventures. Chevron has claimed to be the world's largest producer of geothermal energy. In October 2011, Chevron launched a 29-MW thermal solar-to-steam facility in the Coalinga Field to produce the steam for enhanced oil recovery. The project is the largest of its kind in the world.
Chevron is also one of the first two fuel brands to be Top Tier certified. The other is Tulsa, Oklahoma based QuikTrip.



Contents


1 History

1.1 Predecessors
1.2 Formation of the Chevron name
1.3 Merger with Texaco and post-merger


2 Operations

2.1 Upstream
2.2 Downstream
2.3 Alternative energy


3 Corporate affairs

3.1 Finance
3.2 Headquarters
3.3 Political contributions
3.4 Board of directors


4 Niger Delta Partnership Initiative
5 Controversies

5.1 Environmental damage in Ecuador
5.2 Oil spills in Angola
5.3 U.S. Clean Air Act Settlements
5.4 NiMH battery technology for automobiles
5.5 Niger Delta shootings
5.6 UN sanctions
5.7 Richmond, California refinery
5.8 Oil spill off the coast of Rio de Janeiro
5.9 KS Endeavor explosion
5.10 Forest Fire in Lawachara National Park, Bangladesh
5.11 Polish gas exploration
5.12 Argentina agreement and protests
5.13 Public Eye Lifetime Award
5.14 Global warming


6 See also
7 References
8 External links



History[edit]
Predecessors[edit]




Chart of the major energy companies dubbed "Big Oil" sorted by latest published revenue


One of Chevron's early predecessors, Star Oil, discovered oil at the Pico Canyon Oilfield in the Santa Susana Mountains north of Los Angeles in 1876. The 25 barrels of oil per day well marked the discovery of the Newhall Field, and is considered by geophysicist Marius Vassiliou as the beginning of the modern oil industry in California.[7] Energy analyst Antonia Juhasz has said that while Star Oil's founders were influential in establishing an oil industry in California, Union Mattole Company discovered oil in the state eleven years prior.[8]
In September 1879, Charles N. Felton, Lloyd Tevis, George Loomis and others created the Pacific Coast Oil Company, which acquired the assets of Star Oil[7] with $1 million in funding.[9] Pacific Coast Oil became the largest oil interest in California,[9] by time it was acquired by Standard Oil for $761,000 in 1900.[7] Pacific Coast operated independently and retained its name until 1906, when it was merged with a Standard Oil subsidiary and it became Standard Oil Company (California) or California Standard.[10][11]
Another predecessor, Texas Fuel Company, was founded in 1901 in Beaumont, Texas as an oil equipment vendor by "Buckskin Joe". The founder's nickname came from being harsh and aggressive.[8] Texas Fuel worked closely with Chevron. In 1936 it formed a joint venture with California Standard named Caltex, to drill and produce oil in Saudi Arabia.[12] According to energy analyst and activist shareholder Antonia Juhasz,[13][14][15] the Texas Fuel Company and California Standard were often referred to as the "terrible twins" for their cutthroat business practices.[16] The Texas Fuel Company was renamed the Texas Company, and later renamed Texaco.[11][16]
Formation of the Chevron name[edit]




A Chevron station branded under the Standard name in Las Vegas


In 1911, the federal government broke Standard Oil into several pieces under the Sherman Antitrust Act. One of those pieces, Standard Oil Co. (California), went on to become Chevron. It became part of the "Seven Sisters", which dominated the world oil industry in the early 20th century. In 1926, the company changed its name to Standard Oil Co. of California (SOCAL).[17] By the terms of the breakup of Standard Oil, at first Standard of California could use the Standard name only within its original geographic area of the Pacific coast states, plus Nevada and Arizona; outside that area, it had to use another name. Today Chevron is the owner of the Standard Oil trademark in 16 states in the western and southeastern U.S. To maintain ownership of the mark, the company owns and operates one Standard-branded Chevron station in each state of the area.[18] Although its status in Kentucky is up in the air after Chevron withdrew retail sales from Kentucky in July 2010.[19]
The Chevron name came into use for some of its retail products in the 1930s. The name Calso was also used from 1946 to 1955 in states outside its native West Coast territory.[20][21]
Standard Oil Company of California ranked 75th among United States corporations in the value of World War II military production contracts.[22]
In 1933, Saudi Arabia granted California Standard a concession to find oil, which led to the discovery of oil in 1938. In 1948, California Standard discovered the world's largest oil field in Saudi Arabia, Ghawar Field.[23] California Standard's subsidiary, California-Arabian Standard Oil Company, grew over the years and became the Arabian American Oil Company (ARAMCO) in 1944. In 1973, the Saudi government began buying into ARAMCO. By 1980, the company was entirely owned by the Saudis, and in 1988, its name was changed to Saudi Arabian Oil Company—Saudi Aramco.[citation needed]
Standard Oil of California and Gulf Oil merged in 1984, which was the largest merger in history at that time. To comply with U.S. antitrust law, California Standard divested many of Gulf's operating subsidiaries, and sold some Gulf stations and a refinery in the eastern United States. (The refinery is currently owned by Sunoco.) Among the assets sold off were Gulf's retail outlets in Gulf's home market of Pittsburgh, where Chevron lacks a retail presence but does retain a regional headquarters there as of 2013, partially for Marcellus Shale-related drilling.[24] The same year, Standard Oil of California also took the opportunity to change its legal name to Chevron Corporation, since it had already been using the well-known "Chevron" retail brand name for decades. Chevron would sell the Gulf Oil trademarks for the entire U.S. to Cumberland Farms, the parent company of Gulf Oil LP, in 2010 after Cumberland Farms had a license to the Gulf trademark in the Northeastern United States since 1986.[25]
In 1996 Chevron transferred its natural gas gathering, operating and marketing operation to NGC Corporation (later Dynegy) in exchange for a roughly 25% equity stake in NGC.[26] In a merger completed February 1, 2000, Illinova Corp. became a wholly owned subsidiary of Dynegy Inc. and Chevron's stake increased up to 28%.[27] However, in May 2007 Chevron sold its stake in the company for approximately $985 million, resulting in a gain of $680 million.[28][29]
Merger with Texaco and post-merger[edit]
On October 15, 2000, Chevron announced acquisition of Texaco in a deal valued at $45 billion, creating the second-largest oil company in the United States and the world's fourth-largest publicly traded oil company with a combined market value of approximately $95 billion.[30][31][32][33] The merged company was named ChevronTexaco. On May 9, 2005, ChevronTexaco announced it would drop the Texaco moniker and return to the Chevron name. Texaco remained as a brand under the Chevron Corporation.[34]
On October 10, 2001, Texaco purchased General Motors' share in GM Ovonics, which in 2003, was restructured into Cobasys, a 50/50 joint venture between Chevron and Energy Conversion Devices Ovonics. In 2009, both Chevron and Energy Conservation Devices sold their stakes in Cobasys to SB LiMotive Co.[citation needed]




Chevron gas station design used until 2006


In 2005, Chevron purchased Unocal Corporation for $18.4 billion, increasing the company's petroleum and natural gas reserves by about 15%.[35][36][37][38] Because of Unocal's large South East Asian geothermal operations, Chevron became a large producer of geothermal energy.[39]
Chevron and the Los Alamos National Laboratory started a cooperation in 2006 to improve the recovery of hydrocarbons from oil shale by developing a shale oil extraction process named Chevron CRUSH.[40] In 2006, the United States Department of the Interior issued a research, development and demonstration lease for Chevron's demonstration oil shale project on public lands in Colorado's Piceance Basin.[41] In February 2012, Chevron notified the Bureau of Land Management and the Department of Reclamation, Mining and Safety that it intends to divest this lease.[42]
In July 2010, Chevron ended retail operations in the Mid-Atlantic United States, removing the Chevron and Texaco names from 1,100 stations.[43] In 2011, Chevron acquired Pennsylvania based Atlas Energy Inc. for $3.2 billion in cash and an additional $1.1 billion in existing debt owed by Atlas.[44][45][46] Three months later, Chevron acquired drilling and development rights for another 228,000 acres in the Marcellus Shale from Chief Oil & Gas LLC and Tug Hill, Inc.[47]
In September 2013, Total S.A and its joint venture partner agreed to buy Chevron’s retail distribution business in Pakistan for an undisclosed amount.[48] In October 2014, Chevron announced that it would sell a 30 percent holding in its Canadian oil shale holdings to Kuwait’s state-owned oil company Kuwait Oil Company for a fee of $1.5 billion.[49]
Operations[edit]
Chevron employs approximately 62,000 people (of whom approximately 31,000 are employed in U.S. operations). In October 2015, Chevron announced that it is cutting up to 7,000 jobs, or 11 percent of its workforce.[50]
Upstream[edit]
Chevron's oil and gas exploration and production operations are primarily in the US, Australia, Nigeria, Angola, Kazakhstan, and the Gulf of Mexico. As of December 31, 2010, the company had 10.545 billion barrels (1.6765 billion cubic metres) of oil-equivalent net proved reserves. Daily production in 2010 was 2.763 million barrels per day (439.3 thousand cubic metres per day).
In the United States, the company operates approximately 11,000 oil and natural gas wells in hundreds of fields occupying 4,000,000 acres (16,000 km2) across the Permian Basin, located in West Texas and southeastern New Mexico. In 2010, Chevron was the fourth largest producer in the region.[51] In February 2011, Chevron celebrated the production of its 5 billionth barrel of Permian Basin oil.[52] The Gulf of Mexico is where the company's deepest offshore drilling takes place at Tahiti and Blind Faith. It also explores and drills the Marcellus Shale formation under several northeastern US states.
Chevron's largest single resource project is the $43 billion Gorgon Gas Project in Australia. It also produces natural gas from Western Australia. The $43 billion project was started in 2010 and was expected to be brought online in 2014.[53] The project includes construction of a 15 million tonne per annum liquefied natural gas plant on Barrow Island, and a domestic gas plant with the capacity to provide 300 terajoules per day to supply gas to Western Australia.[54] It is also developing the Wheatstone liquefied natural gas development in Western Australia. The foundation phase of the project is estimated to cost $29 billion; it will consist of two LNG processing trains with a combined capacity of 8.9 million tons per annum, a domestic gas plant and associated offshore infrastructure.[55] In August 2014 a significant gas-condensate discovery at the Lasseter-1 exploration well in WA-274-P in Western Australia, in which Chevron has a 50% interest was announced.[56]
In the onshore and near-offshore regions of the Niger Delta, Chevron operates under a joint venture with the Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation, operating and holding a 40% interest in 13 concessions in the region. In addition, Chevron operates the Escravos Gas Plant and the Escravos gas-to-liquids plant.[57]
Chevron has interests in four concessions in Angola, including offshore two concessions in Cabinda province, the Tombua–Landana development and the Mafumeira Norte project, operated by the company. It is also a leading partner in Angola LNG plant.[58][59]
In Kazakhstan, Chevron participate the Tengiz and Karachaganak projects.[60] In 2010, Chevron became the largest private shareholder in the Caspian Pipeline Consortium pipeline, which transports oil from the Caspian Sea to the Black Sea.[61]
As of 2013, the Rosebank oil and gas field west of Shetland was being evaluated by Chevron and its partners. Chevron drilled its discovery well there in 2004. Production is expected in 2015 if a decision is made to produce from the field. The geology and weather conditions are challenging.[62]
Downstream[edit]
Chevron's downstream operations manufacture and sell products such as fuels, lubricants, additives and petrochemicals. The company's most significant areas of operations are the west coast of North America, the U.S. Gulf Coast, Southeast Asia, South Korea, Australia and South Africa. In 2010, Chevron sold an average 3.1 million barrels per day (490×10^3 m3/d) of refined products like gasoline, diesel and jet fuel.[63] The company operates approximately 19,550 retail sites in 84 countries. The company also has interests in 13 power generating assets in the United States and Asia and has gas stations in Western Canada.[citation needed] Chevron owns the trademark rights to Texaco and Caltex fuel and lubricant products.[citation needed]
In 2010, Chevron processed 1.9 million barrels per day (300×10^3 m3/d) of crude oil.[63] It owns and operates five active refineries in the United States, one in Cape Town, South Africa, and one in Burnaby, British Columbia. Chevron is the non-operating partner in seven joint venture refineries, located in Australia,[64] Pakistan,[65] Singapore, Thailand, South Korea, and New Zealand.[66] Chevron's United States refineries are located in Gulf and Western states. Chevron also owns an asphalt refinery in Perth Amboy, New Jersey; however, since early 2008 that refinery has primarily operated as a terminal.[67]
Chevron's chemicals business includes 50% ownership in the Chevron Phillips Chemical Company, which manufactures petrochemicals, and the Chevron Oronite Company, which develops, manufactures and sells fuel and lubricant additives.[citation needed]
Chevron Chemical produced paraquat.[68]
Chevron Shipping Company, a wholly owned subsidiary, provides the maritime transport operations, marine consulting services and marine risk management services for Chevron Corporation.[citation needed] Chevron ships historically had names beginning with "Chevron", such as Chevron Washington and Chevron South America, or were named after former or serving directors of the company. Samuel Ginn, William E. Crain, Kenneth Derr, Richard Matzke and most notably Condoleezza Rice were among those honored, but the ship named after Rice was subsequently renamed as Altair Voyager.[69]
Alternative energy[edit]




Chevron's 500kW Solarmine photovoltaic solar project in Fellows, California


The Chevron's alternative energy operations include geothermal, solar, wind, biofuel, fuel cells, and hydrogen.[70]
Chevron has claimed to be the world's largest producer of geothermal energy.[39] The company's geothermal operations are primarily located in Southeast Asia.[71][72][73]
Chevron operates geothermal wells in Indonesia providing power to Jakarta and the surrounding area. In the Philippines, Chevron also operates geothermal wells at Tiwi field in Albay province, the Makiling-Banahaw field in Laguna and Quezon provinces.[74]
In 2007, Chevron and the United States Department of Energy's National Renewable Energy Laboratory (NREL) started collaboration to develop and produce algae fuel, which could be converted into transportation fuels, such as jet fuel.[75] In 2008, Chevron and Weyerhaeuser created Catchlight Energy LLC, which researches the conversion of cellulose-based biomass into biofuels.[76] In 2013, the Catchlight plan was downsized due to competition with fossil fuel projects for funds.[77]
Between 2006 and 2011, Chevron contributed up to $12 million to a strategic research alliance with the Georgia Institute of Technology to develop cellulosic biofuels and to create a process to convert biomass like wood or switchgrass into fuels. Additionally, Chevron holds a 22% stake in Galveston Bay Biodiesel LP, which produces up to 110 million US gallons (420,000 m3) of renewable biodiesel fuel a year.[78][79]
In 2010, the Chevron announced a 740 kW photovoltaic demonstration project in Bakersfield, California, called Project Brightfield, for exploring possibilities to use solar power for powering Chevron's facilities. It consists of technologies from seven companies, which Chevron is evaluating for large-scale use.[80][81] In Fellows, California, Chevron has invested in the 500 kW Solarmine photovoltaic solar project, which supplies daytime power to the Midway-Sunset Oil Field.[82] In Questa, Chevron has built a 1 MW concentrated photovoltaic plant that comprises 173 solar arrays, which use Fresnel lenses.[83][84] In October 2011, Chevron launched a 29-MW thermal solar-to-steam facility in the Coalinga Field to produce the steam for enhanced oil recovery. As of 2012, the project is the largest of its kind in the world.[85]
In 2014, Chevron began reducing its investment in renewable energy technologies, reducing headcount and selling alternative energy-related assets.[86]
Corporate affairs[edit]
Finance[edit]
For the fiscal year 2011, Chevron reported earnings of US$26.9 billion, with an annual revenue of US$257.3 billion, an increase of 23.3% over the previous fiscal cycle. Chevron's shares traded at over $105 per share, and its market capitalization was valued at over US$240 billion.[87]
Headquarters[edit]




Chevron tower in Houston


Chevron's corporate headquarters are located in a 92-acre campus in San Ramon, California. The company moved there from its earlier headquarters at 555 Market Street in San Francisco, California, where it was located since its inception in 1879.[88] Chevron also operates from office towers in Houston, Texas, where it leased the 1500 Louisiana Street and 1400 Smith Street from former Texas energy giant Enron. Chevron is also planning a new office tower in downtown Houston next to its existing properties at 1600 Louisiana Street.[89] The building will stand 50-stories and 832 feet. Upon completion, it'll be the fourth tallest building in Houston and the first 50-story building constructed there in nearly 30 years.
Political contributions[edit]
Since January 2011 Chevron has contributed almost $15 million on Washington lobbying. On October 7, 2012 Chevron donated $2.5 million to the Republican Congressional Leadership Fund super PAC that is closely tied to former House Speaker John Boehner.[90]
Board of directors[edit]

John S. Watson (Chairman & CEO)
George L. Kirkland (Vice Chairman)
Linnet F. Deily
Robert Denham
Robert James Eaton
Franklyn Jenifer
Enrique Hernandez, Jr.
Donald Rice
Kevin W. Sharer
Charles Shoemate
John G. Stumpf
Ronald Sugar

Condoleezza Rice is a former member of the board of directors, and also headed Chevron's committee on public policy until she resigned on January 15, 2001, to become National Security Advisor to President George W. Bush.
On September 30, 2009, John Watson, age 52, was elected Chairman of the Board and CEO, effective at the December 31, 2009 retirement of David J. O'Reilly.
Niger Delta Partnership Initiative[edit]
In 2010 Chevron established the Niger Delta Partnership Initiative (NDPI), a non-profit that works with local organizations to promote economic growth, reduce HIV transmission rates, and empower women. The Initiative was initially funded with a $50 million grant. An additional $40 million was donated in 2013.[91][92]
Controversies[edit]
Environmental damage in Ecuador[edit]
Main article: Lago Agrio oil field




Oil pollution in Lago Agrio, November 2007


Texaco and Gulf Oil began operating in the Oriente region of Ecuador in 1964 as a consortium.[93] Texaco operated the Lago Agrio oil field from 1972 to 1993 and the Ecuador state oil company continued to operate the same oil fields after Texaco left. In 1993, Texaco was found responsible for dumping billions of gallons of toxic waste and they spent $40m cleaning up the area during the 1990s. In 1998, the Ecuadorean government signed an agreement with Texaco accepting the clean-up as complete and absolving Texaco of any further responsibility. That same year, an Ecuadorean scientific team took water and soil samples after Texaco left and found petroleum hydrocarbons at unsafe levels in almost half. The clean up was called "a sham" by critics.[who?][94]
In 2003, a class action lawsuit against Chevron was filed in Ecuadorian court for $28 billion by indigenous residents, who accused Texaco of making residents ill and damaging forests and rivers by discharging 18 billion US gallons (68,000,000 m3) of formation water into the Amazon rainforest without any environmental remediation.[95][96][97][98][99] Chevron said that the company had completed cleanup of the pollution caused by Texaco, that current pollution was the result of activities of the Ecuadorian oil interests, and that the 1998 agreements with the Ecuadorian Government exempted the company from any liabilities.[100][101][101][102][103]
In 2011, Ecuadorian residents were awarded $8.6 billion, based on claims of loss of crops and farm animals as well as increased local cancer rates.[94][104][105] The plaintiffs said this would not be enough to make up for the damage caused by the oil company.[106] The award was later revised to $19 billion on appeals, which was then appealed again to the Ecuadorean National Court of Justice.[107] The action has been called the first time that indigenous people have successfully sued a multinational corporation in the country where the pollution took place.[94][104][106]
Chevron described the lawsuit as an "extortion scheme" and refused to pay the fine.[94]
In November 2013, the international arbitration tribunal issued a partial award in favour of Chevron and its subsidiary, Texaco Petroleum Company. The tribunal has found Chevron is not liable for environmental claims in Ecuador.[108]
In March 2014, a United States district court judge ruled that the Ecuadorian plaintiff’s lead attorney, Steven Donziger, had used “corrupt means,” including "coercion, bribery, money laundering and other misconduct," to obtain the 2011 court verdict in Ecuador. The judge did not rule on the underlying issue of environmental damages. While the US ruling does not affect the decision of the court in Ecuador, it has blocked efforts to collect damages from Chevron in US courts. Donziger has appealed.[100][100][109][110]
In April 2015, AmazonWatch released videos reportedly sent from a whistleblower inside Chevron. The videos purportedly show employees and consultants finding petroleum contamination at sites in the Ecuadorean Amazon that the company claimed was cleaned up years earlier. These videos were confirmed as legitimate by Chevron legal counsel.[111] According to the company, the videos show routine testing to establish the perimeter of oil pits. The company further stated that it is not possible to determine from the videos whether the sites shown are the responsibility of Chevron or its former partner, Petroecuador. According to Amazon Watch, the videos contain a map confirming that the sites are Chevron's, and contain footage of interviews with villagers known to live in the area for which Chevron is responsible.[112]
Chevron continues to take oil from the Amazon region at large. El Segundo (CA), Pascagoula (MS), and Richmond (CA) refineries all process Amazonian oil. In 2015 El Segundo was the single largest refiner in the U.S. of Amazon Crude, processing 54,463 barrels per day.[113]
Oil spills in Angola[edit]
In 2006, Chevron's operations in Africa were criticized as environmentally unsound by 130 Nigerian researchers, journalists, and activists.[114] In 2002 Angola demanded $2 million in compensation for oil spills allegedly caused by Chevron, the first time it had fined a multinational corporation operating in its waters.[115]
U.S. Clean Air Act Settlements[edit]
On October 16, 2003, Chevron U.S.A. settled a charge under the Clean Air Act, which reduced harmful air emissions by about 10,000 tons a year.[116] In San Francisco, Chevron was filed by a consent decree to spend almost $275 million to install and utilize innovative technology to reduce nitrogen and sulfur dioxide emissions at its refineries.[117] In 2000, Chevron paid a $6 million penalty as well as $1 million for environmental improvement projects to settle charges of Clean Air Act violations related to offline loading terminal operations in El Segundo, California.[118] Chevron also had implemented programs that minimized production of hazardous gases, upgraded leak detection and repair procedure, reduced emissions from sulfur recovery plants, and adopted strategies to ensure the proper handling of harmful benzene wastes at refineries.[116] Chevron also spent about $500,000 to install leakless valves and double-sealed pumps at its El Segundo refinery, which could prevent significant emissions of air contaminants.[118]
In 2011, Chevron was recognized by the environmental group Ceres for its efforts to reduce global warming by cutting its own emissions and investing in renewable energy technologies.[119]
NiMH battery technology for automobiles[edit]





This article needs additional citations for verification. Please help improve this article by adding citations to reliable sources. Unsourced material may be challenged and removed. (March 2015) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Cobasys LLC was a supplier of nickel metal hydride (NiMH) batteries, battery control systems, and packaged solutions for automotive applications, uninterruptable power supplies, telecommunications applications, and distributed power generation.[120] For 8 years ending in 2009, Cobasys was a 50-50 joint venture between California-based Chevron Corporation and Michigan-based Energy Conversion Devices, Inc. (also called ECD Ovonics, ECD, or Ovonics)[121][122] The intermediary hierarchy of ownership was that Cobasys LLC was owned by Chevron's subsidiary Chevron Technology Ventures LLC, and ECD Ovonics' subsidiary Ovonic Battery Company.[123] Cobasys spent $180 million in funding from Chevron Technology Ventures, and the two owners were unable to agree on further funding of the company. After arbitration between the owners had stalled, a buyer was found. On July 14, 2009, the sale of Cobasys to SB LiMotive Co. Ltd., an electric vehicle battery joint venture between Samsung SDI Co. Ltd. and Robert Bosch GmbH, was announced.
Sherry Boschert accused Chevron of limiting access to large NiMH batteries through its stake in Cobasys corporation and control of patent licenses in order to remove a competitor to gasoline. Cobasys filed a patent infringement lawsuit against Panasonic and Toyota over production of the EV-95 battery used in the RAV4 EV.[124][125] The case was settled with each company granting the other a license to its patents.[126] In her book, Plug-in Hybrids: The Cars that Will Recharge America, published in February 2007, Sherry Boschert argues that large-format NiMH batteries are commercially viable but that Cobasys refuses to sell the batteries or license the technology to small companies or individuals. Boschert argues that Cobasys accepts only very large orders for the batteries. Major automakers showed little interest in placing large orders for large-format NiMH batteries. However, Toyota complained about the difficulty in getting smaller orders of large format NiMH batteries to service the existing 825 RAV-4EVs. Because no other companies were willing to place large orders, Cobasys was not manufacturing or licensing large format NiMH battery technology for automobiles. Boschert concludes that "it's possible that Cobasys (Chevron) is squelching all access to large NiMH batteries through its control of patent licenses in order to remove a competitor to gasoline. Or it's possible that Cobasys simply wants the market for itself and is waiting for a major automaker to start producing plug-in hybrids or electric vehicles."[127] In an interview with The Economist, the ECD Ovonics founder Stan Ovshinsky disagreed, stating "Cobasys isn't preventing anything. Cobasys just needs an infusion of cash. They build a great battery"."[128]
In October 2007, International Acquisitions Services and Innovative Transportation Systems filed suit against Cobasys and its parents for failure to fill an order for large-format NiMH batteries to be used in the electric Innovan.[129] In August 2008, Mercedes-Benz U.S. International filed suit against Cobasys, on the ground Cobasys did not tender the batteries it agreed to build for Mercedes-Benz's planned hybrid SUV.[130] The Mercedes suit was settled for $1.3 million dollars.[131]
Niger Delta shootings[edit]
On May 28, 1998, activists staged a demonstration and took several individuals hostage on a company oil platform in the Niger Delta, Nigeria. Nigerian police and soldiers were allegedly flown in with Chevron helicopters.[132] Soldiers shot at the activists and subsequently two activists (Jola Ogungbeje and Aroleka Irowaninu) died from their wounds.[132] In 2007 U.S. District Judge Susan Illston, allowed a lawsuit brought by victims and victims' families against Chevron to proceed, saying that there may be evidence that Chevron had hired, supervised, and/or provided transportation to Nigerian military forces known for their "general history of committing abuses."[133] In December 2008, a federal jury cleared Chevron of all charges brought against them in the case. Chevron had stated that the military intervention was necessary to protect the lives of its workers and considers the jury's decision vindication for the accusations of wrongdoing.[134]
UN sanctions[edit]
According to US Embassy Cable BAGHDAD 000791 the Iraqi prime minister believed that Chevron was engaged in negotiations to invest in Iran in contravention of UN sanctions. The embassy related that it had no independent confirmation of this claim.[135] This document was intended to have been kept secret until 2029.[136]
Richmond, California refinery[edit]
The Richmond refinery paid $540,000 in 1998 for illegally bypassing waste water treatments and failing to notify the public about toxic releases.[137] Overall, Chevron is listed as potentially liable for 95 Superfund sites, with funds set aside by the EPA for clean-up.[138][unreliable source?]
A 1989 explosion and fire at the refinery[139] resulted in a $877,000 OSHA fine for "willfully failing to provide protective equipment for employees." Chevron employees had "repeatedly requested" protective equipment since the early 1980s but the company had refused despite more than 70 fires in the plant since 1984. Elizabeth Dole, the US Secretary of Labor, said: "OSHA's investigation makes clear that Chevron knew of the need for protective equipment and clothing."[140]
On March 25, 1999, an explosion and fire at the refinery that spread noxious fumes and sent hundreds of Richmond residents to hospitals.[141]
On August 6, 2012, a large fire erupted at the refinery.[142][143] Initial reports estimated that 11,000 people sought treatment at area hospitals,[144] and later reports placed the number above 15,000 people.[145] The company pleaded no contest to six charges in connection with the fire, and agreed to pay $2 million in fines and restitution.[146] Around the same time the settlement was announced, the Richmond city council voted to file suit against Chevron. The reasons for the suit included "a continuation of years of neglect, lax oversight and corporate indifference to necessary safety inspection and repairs."[145]
Oil spill off the coast of Rio de Janeiro[edit]
Further information: Energy in Brazil
On November 8, 2011, Chevron came under fire by Brazilian authorities for its role in the spill of crude oil off of the southeastern coast of Brazil.[147] The Brazilian regulators said 416,400 liters of oil leaked over the course of two weeks from undersea rock near the well in the Frade oil project 370 km off the Brazilian coast.[148] Prosecutors in Brazil initially demanded $10.6bn in the subsequent lawsuit. The National Petroleum Agency (ANP) suspended Chevron's activities in Brazil until it identified the cause of an oil spill off the coast of Rio de Janeiro.[149]
The National Petroleum Agency later concluded that the spill did not cause significant economic damage, injured no one, and never approached Brazil's coast. Criminal charges were dropped and the lawsuits were settled for a total of $130 million.[150][151]
KS Endeavor explosion[edit]
The KS Endeavor jackup rig exploded on January 16, 2012, while drilling an exploration well for Chevron in the Funiwa field in Nigeria. The explosion resulted in the death of two of the 154 workers on board and a fire that burned for 46 days before the well was sealed on June 18. According to a Reuters news report, workers on the KS Endeavor were ignored by Chevron when they requested evacuation due to concerns of increasing smoke billowing from the drilling borehole. A senior worker said the blowout was triggered by a massive build-up of pressure. A witness said that rig engineers advised Chevron to stop drilling and evacuate staff but Chevron told them to continue with drilling. Expecting an explosion, the rig manager, one of the two that later died, kept the lifeboats at hand and ready for use. A witness reported: "This is the reason so many of us survived because we were all aware that it was going to happen, but just didn't know when." In an email response to Reuters, Chevron said it did not receive requests to evacuate the rig and that staff on board had the right to call a halt to work if they believed conditions were unsafe.[152][153]
Forest Fire in Lawachara National Park, Bangladesh[edit]
On June 26, 2008, a forest fire broke out in Lawachara National Park, Bangladesh, while Chevron was carrying out a 3D seismic survey. Chevron stated that it was not conducting activities in the area in which the fire broke out.[154][155]
Polish gas exploration[edit]
Chevron has experienced protests aimed at the company by local communities in Southern Poland when they started gas exploration in the region. Their complaint is that Chevron didn't provide all of the documents required for gas exploration in Poland, and that the company has not promised to share a percentage of the revenues with the local landholders. The landholders of the region view Chevron's presence in the region negatively since they may be forced to sell their properties at a low cost if gas is discovered in the region. As well, potential environmental disasters are a concern for local farmers. Another of the residents' primary concern is water pollution from the chemicals used in fracking. In response to some of the protests, Chevron has sued some of the protesters from Żurawlów for disrupting their operations.[156]
According to gas and oil expert Andrzej Szczesniak, one of the main reasons for the protest is the difference between Polish and American law. In the USA property owners typically receive 15-20% from the income of gas exploration. In Poland, the discovery of gas on private property usually results in a forced sale of the property, with the owner receiving only the prior value of the land and no percentage of the gas revenue. This is the result of outdated, Communist Era laws that are still on the books and which are often exploited by municipal governments if they can get a 'kick back' from a larger company.[157][158]
Argentina agreement and protests[edit]
After the 2012 decision of the Argentine government to regain control of the biggest oil company of the country, YPF, the search for foreign investors for exploitation of unconventional oil started. Finally in 2013, YPF and Chevron signed an agreement for the Vaca Muerta oil field, the world’s second-largest shale gas deposit. In August 2013, the Congress of Neuquén province approved the agreement, while between 5,000[159][160] and 10,000[161] workers, students and indigenous people protested outside the legislature. Police fired rubber bullets, hitting some protesters.[159] Governor Jorge Sapag defended the police actions: “The march was generally peaceful, but about 100 people separated from the rest and attacked the police. The police acted with seriousness and professionalism.”[162]
Public Eye Lifetime Award[edit]
In 2015, Chevron received the Lifetime Award of the Public Eye on Davos for what the sponsors called Chevron's responsibility for environmental disaster in the Amazon.[163] The same group cited the company in 2006 in the category "Environment" for oil soiling in the Amazonas in Ecuador.[164] A Chevron spokesperson commented that the award was "nothing more than a stunt to distract attention from the fact that the lawsuit against Chevron in Ecuador has been proven to be meritless and the product of unprecedented fraud" and pointed to a U.S. court finding that the plaintiff's lawyers had committed "mail and wire fraud, money laundering, witness tampering and obstruction of justice." [165] That controversial RICO case is under appeal and has been criticized by environmental and human rights groups.[166]
Global warming[edit]
In a letter Chevron Corp. argued that under current disclosure rules companies are already required to disclose material risks including climate-change risk, during part of the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission’s consultation process, noting that its “2015 Form 10-K included a significant discussion of the potential risks of additional greenhouse gas emissions regulation following the outcome of the Paris Accord.”[167]
See also[edit]


San Francisco Bay Area portal
Companies portal



Chevron U.S.A., Inc. v. Natural Resources Defense Council, Inc.
Climate appraisal
Climate risk management
Gordon L. Park
global warming
Jack 2
Patent encumbrance of large automotive NiMH batteries
RAV4 EV
Texaco
Trans-Caribbean pipeline

References[edit]


^ "The Evolution of 5 Oil and Gas Logos". Castagra. Castagra. Retrieved 31 March 2017. 
^ "Company Profile". Chevron.com. Retrieved August 9, 2011. 
^ a b c d e "2016 Press Releases - Chevron". 
^ Chevron Factsheet "Corporate Factsheet", May 2016.
^ "Chevron". Fortune 500. fortune.com. 2014. 
^ "Chevron". Fortune Global 500. fortune.com. 2014. 
^ a b c M. S. Vassiliou (March 2, 2009). Historical Dictionary of the Petroleum Industry. Scarecrow Press. pp. 128–. ISBN 978-0-8108-6288-3. Retrieved August 8, 2013. 
^ a b Antonia Juhasz (October 6, 2009). The Bush Agenda. HarperCollins. pp. 106–. ISBN 978-0-06-197761-9. Retrieved August 9, 2013. 
^ a b Joshua Karliner (1997). The Corporate Planet: Ecology and Politics in the Age of Globalization. University of California Press. pp. 61–. ISBN 978-0-87156-434-4. Retrieved August 8, 2013. 
^ M. S. Vassiliou (September 24, 2009). The A to Z of the Petroleum Industry. Scarecrow Press. pp. 128–. ISBN 978-0-8108-7066-6. Retrieved August 9, 2013. 
^ a b Toyin Falola (January 1, 2005). The Politics of the Global Oil Industry: An Introduction. Greenwood Publishing Group. pp. 33–. ISBN 978-0-275-98400-7. Retrieved August 9, 2013. 
^ Charles A. S. Hall; Carlos A. Ramírez-Pascualli (December 5, 2012). The First Half of the Age of Oil: An Exploration of the Work of Colin Campbell and Jean Laherr√®re. Springer. pp. 34–. ISBN 978-1-4614-6064-0. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ Juhasz, Antonia (September 28, 2010). "Chevron Throws Book at Shareholder Activist (Me)". The Huffington Post. Retrieved August 17, 2013. 
^ Letzing, John (September 29, 2010). "Activist Faces Charges in Chevron Meeting Outburst". The Wall Street Journal. Retrieved August 17, 2013. 
^ "Protesters Disrupt BP's First Shareholder Meeting Since Oil Spill". Environment News Service. April 14, 2011. Retrieved August 17, 2013. 
^ a b Antonia Juhasz (October 6, 2009). The Tyranny of Oil: The World's Most Powerful Industry--and What We Must Do to Stop It. HarperCollins. pp. 71–. ISBN 978-0-06-198201-9. Retrieved August 10, 2013. 
^ Baker, David R. (May 10, 2005). "Chevron drops the Texaco from its name". San Francisco Chronicle. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ Droz, Robert V. "Standard Oil Today". US Highways from US 1 to US 830. Archived from the original on October 17, 2015. 
^ "Eastern Withdrawal for Chevron". Archived from the original on July 8, 2011. 
^ "Chevron and Calso". Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ "Vintage Calso Gasoline / Standard Oil of California pump". Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ Peck, Merton J. & Scherer, Frederic M. The Weapons Acquisition Process: An Economic Analysis (1962) Harvard Business School p.619
^ "The King of Giant Fields". Retrieved June 5, 2013. 
^ Belko, Mark; Schwartzel, Erich (May 1, 2013). "Chevron acquires Kmart property in Moon for possible regional headquarters - Pittsburgh Post-Gazette". Pittsburgh Post-Gazette. 
^ "Gulf Oil acquires brand rights for entire US". Vermont Business Magazine. January 13, 2010. Retrieved May 5, 2010. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 10-Q, Quarterly Report, Filing Date Nov 8, 1996". secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 8-K, Current Report, Filing Date Mar 6, 2000". secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 8-K, Current Report, Filing Date May 25, 2007" (PDF). secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ "Chevron's Profit Rises 24%, With Help From Its Refineries". The New York Times. Reuters. July 28, 2007. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 8-K, Current Report, Filing Date Oct 16, 2000". secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ "Oil giant Chevron buys rival Texaco". BBC News. October 16, 2000. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ "Chevron to Acquire Texaco". The Street.com. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ Raine, George (October 10, 2001). "The Chevron - Texaco Merger / An oil giant emergers / Shareholders approval of Chevron-Texaco deal creates industy's lates behemoth.". San Francisco Chronicle. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 8-K, Current Report, Filing Date May 10, 2005" (PDF). secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 8-K, Current Report, Filing Date Apr 7, 2005". secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 8-K, Current Report, Filing Date Aug 10, 2005" (PDF). secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ Baker, David R. (April 5, 2005). "Chevron plans to buy Unocal for $18.4 billion / Deal would bolster East Bay oil giant's strategically located sources of gas, crude". San Francisco Chronicle. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ Blum, Justin (August 11, 2005). "Shareholders Vote in Favor Of Unocal Acquisition". The Washington Post. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ a b "Chevron claims energy debate". BBC News. February 19, 2006. Retrieved December 31, 2009. 
^ "Chevron and Los Alamos Jointly Research Oil Shale Hydrocarbon Recovery". Green Car Congress. September 25, 2006. Retrieved April 12, 2009. 
^ "Interior Department Issues Oil Shale Research, Development and Demonstration Leases for Public Lands in Colorado" (Press release). Bureau of Land Management. December 15, 2006. Retrieved April 12, 2009. 
^ "Chevron leaving Western Slope oil shale project". Denver Business Journal. February 28, 2012. Retrieved March 12, 2012. 
^ "Eastern Withdrawal for Chevron | CSP Daily News / Magazine | Petroleum - CSP Information Group, Inc. - news for convenience & petroleum retailing". Cspnet.com. December 7, 2009. Retrieved January 10, 2014. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form DFAN14A, Filing Date Nov 9, 2010". secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ Kaplan, Thomas (November 9, 2010). "Chevron to Buy Atlas Energy for $4.3 Billion". The New York Times. Retrieved May 2, 2011. 
^ "Chevron Corp, Form 10-K, Annual Report, Filing Date Feb 24, 2011". secdatabase.com. Retrieved March 24, 2013. 
^ "Chevron Continues Aggressive Expansion into Marcellus Shale in PA – Buys Leases for Additional 228K Acres from Chief Oil & Gas | Marcellus Drilling News". Marcellusdrilling.com. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ Louise Heavens (18 September 2013). "France's Total snaps up Chevron's Pakistan retail network". Reuters. 
^ Chevron sells stake in Canadian shale field to Kuwait. Reuters, 7 October 2014
^ "Chevron cutting up to 7,000 jobs". CBS. Retrieved 30 October 2015. 
^ Ordonez, Isabel (April 8, 2011). "Chevron Rekindles Old Texas Flame". The Wall Street Journal. 
^ "Chevron celebrates 5 billion barrels of Permian Basin crude - Mywesttexas.com: Local Newsroom". Mywesttexas.com. February 16, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ Garrett, Geoffrey (August 13, 2011). "Why this love triangle works". The Australian. 
^ "Chevron's Gorgon project taking shape | Latest Business & Australian Stock market News". Perth Now. February 2, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ Burrell, Andrew (June 15, 2011). "Chevron's Wheatstone LNG project to generate 6,500 jobs, says Roy Krzywosinski". The Australian. 
^ "Higher interim dividend by Santos as oil and gas revenue rises". Australian News.Net. 21 August 2014. Retrieved 22 August 2014. 
^ "Escravos Gas-to-Liquids Project, Niger Delta". Hydrocarbons Technology. June 15, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Chevron Corporation (CVX) Stock Description". Seeking Alpha. December 31, 2009. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Angola LNG". Angola Today. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Chevron Rises To $104 As Kazakhstan Kicks Up Production". Forbes. October 13, 2011. Retrieved June 23, 2013. 
^ "Caspian Pipeline Consortium: Private Company Information - Businessweek". Investing.businessweek.com. September 20, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ Stanley Reed (July 23, 2013). "Chevron to Spend $770 Million on Remote Projects". The New York Times. Retrieved July 23, 2013. 
^ a b "e10vk". Sec.gov. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ Paton, James (August 22, 2011). "Caltex Australia Starts Review of Refineries as Margins Drop". Bloomberg L.P. 
^ Tanveer Ahmed (July 1, 2010). "PSO willing to raise stakes in PRL". 'Daily Times. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "N.Z. Refining Jumps After Valero Said to Plan Bid (Update2)". Bloomberg L.P. July 24, 2009. 
^ "Refining Crude Oil - Energy Explained, Your Guide To Understanding Energy". Eia.gov. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Paraquat". 
^ Marinucci, Carla (May 5, 2001). "Chevron redubs ship named for Bush aide". San Francisco Chronicle. Retrieved October 13, 2008. 
^ Hsu, Tiffany (March 22, 2010). "Chevron is putting solar technologies to the test". Los Angeles Times. Retrieved July 11, 2013. 
^ "Harnessing the Heat of Indonesia's Volcanoes". Bloomberg Businessweek. July 7, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Chevron bets on $30B volcanoes beneath rainforest". Financial Post. June 15, 2011. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Chevron to expand its geothermal sites in the Philippines". Think GeoEnergy. June 21, 2010. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Aboitiz, Chevron eye more drillings at Tiwi-Makban geothermal fields". Business. Philippines: Philstar.com. July 13, 2009. 
^ "Chevron backs green and slimy answer to biofuel problems - 02 Nov 2007 - News from". BusinessGreen. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Chevron investigates wood-fired cars - 04 Mar 2008 - News from". BusinessGreen. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Chevron Defies California On Carbon Emissions". Bloomberg L.P. April 18, 2013. Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ "Chevron forms $12M biofuel research alliance". Bizjournals.com. June 15, 2006. 
^ "BioSelect, Chevron unveil Galveston biodiesel plant". Bizjournals.com. May 29, 2007. 
^ Swartz, Jon (May 26, 2011). "Big companies aggressively jump into clean tech". USA Today. 
^ Woody, Todd (May 22, 2010). "Chevron Testing Solar Technologies". The New York Times. Retrieved June 23, 2013. 
^ "Solar energy powers production of heavy oil in California". Oil & Gas Journal. May 2, 2007. (subscription required). Retrieved June 23, 2013. 
^ "Chevron adds solar power to area mine". UPI. February 24, 2010. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Solar farm a sign of things to come". U-T San Diego. April 20, 2011. Retrieved June 23, 2013. 
^ Korosec, Kirsten (October 3, 2011). "Chevron uses solar power to produce more oil". SmartPlanet. Retrieved July 23, 2012. 
^ "Chevron Makes It Official With Sale of Renewable-Energy Unit to OpTerra - Businessweek". 
^ "AP/ January 27, 2012, 12:21 PM Chevron 4Q profit falls on refinery decline". CBS News. January 27, 2012. Retrieved July 15, 2013. 
^ Raine, George (September 6, 2001). "Ending an era, Chevron abandons S.F. headquarters / Exodus to San Ramon complete". San Francisco Chronicle. Retrieved July 15, 2013. 
^ Daugherty, Deon (July 8, 2013). "Chevron plans new Houston tower, hiring spree". Houston Business Journal. Retrieved July 15, 2013. 
^ "Chevron donates $2.5 million to GOP super PAC". The Washington Post. 
^ "Chevron to donate $40 million to Niger focused NGO". Reuters. June 11, 2014. Retrieved 2015-03-16. 
^ "Chevron, NGO partner to empower indigent women". Daily Independent. June 11, 2014. Retrieved 2015-03-16. 
^ Juan Forero "Rain Forest Residents, Texaco Face Off In Ecuador". NPR, April 30, 2009. Retrieved December 17, 2012
^ a b c d "Finally, the polluter is commanded to pay". The Independent. London. February 16, 2011. p. 2. 
^ Bogumil Terminski "Oil-Induced Displacement and Resettlement: Social Problem and Human Rights Issue". Conflictrecovery.org.
^ Paul Barrett “Top U.S. Law Firms Battle in Chevron's Pollution Case”. Businessweek, January 15, 2013. Retrieved January 17, 2013
^ Patrick Radden Keefe “Reversal of Fortune”. The New Yorker, January 9, 2012. Retrieved January 21, 2013.
^ "Texaco faces $1bn lawsuit". Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ "Chevron fined for Amazon pollution by Ecuador court". BBC News. Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ a b c Kraus, Clifford (March 4, 2014). "Big Victory for Chevron over Claims in Ecuador". New York Times. Retrieved 2015-03-16. 
^ a b Chevron Corporation 2008 Annual Shareholders' Report.
^ Font size Print E-mail Share 130 Comments Page 2 of 4 (May 3, 2009). "60 Minutes "Amazon Crude", May 3, 2009". CBS News. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ "Chevron annual meeting heats up over Ecuador suit". sify.com. Associated Press. May 31, 2009. 
^ a b "Chevron fined for Amazon pollution by Ecuador court". BBC News. February 15, 2011. Retrieved February 15, 2011. 
^ "Ecuador court orders Chevron to pay $8 bln -lawyer". Reuters. February 15, 2011. Retrieved February 15, 2011. 
^ a b "Ecuador plaintiffs say Chevron ruling falls short". Reuters. February 15, 2011. Retrieved February 15, 2011. 
^ Chevron fails to block $18 billion Ecuador judgment. Reuters, October 9, 2 . Retrieved January 25, 2013
^ "Chevron gets one up on Ecuador". EnergyNewsBulletin.net. Retrieved 19 September 2013. 
^ "U.S. Judge Hands Win to Chevron, Slams Lawyer". The Wall Street Journal. March 4, 2014. 
^ BBC, US judge annuls Ecuador oil ruling against Chevron, 4 Mar. 2014.
^ "Letter Showing Chevron Asked for Videos Back". 
^ "Videos Suggest Cover-up of Amazon pollution - Al Jazeera America". 
^ [The Corpus Christi (TX) and Lake Charles (LA) refineries have "From Well to Wheel: The Social, Environmental, and Climate Costs of Amazon Crude"] Check |url= value (help). Amazon Watch. Retrieved 27 March 2017. 
^ "Chevron, Oil Pollution, and Human Rights". AfricaResource.com. October 30, 2006. Archived from the original on 2006-10-30. 
^ "Business | Angola fines Chevron for pollution". BBC News. July 1, 2002. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ a b "U.S. Announces Clean Air Agreement with Chevron U.S.A.". Environmental Protection Agency. October 16, 2003. Retrieved September 24, 2013. 
^ "U.S. Announces Clean Air Settlement with Chevron U.S.A.". Department of Justice. October 16, 2003. Retrieved May 6, 2008. 
^ a b "Chevron Agrees to Record $7 Million Environmental Settlement". Department of Justice. August 11, 2000. Retrieved May 6, 2008. 
^ Baker, David R. (March 22, 2006). "Quest for clean energy / Chevron, PG&E cited for positive steps to combat global warming". Sfgate.com. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ Markets Served Archived January 5, 2016, at the Wayback Machine. Cobasys. Retrieved on 2007-08-06.
^ Cobabsys: Investors Archived January 5, 2016, at the Wayback Machine. (Corporate website). Cobasys. Retrieved on 2007-08-07.
^ Roberson, J. Supplier Cobasys exploring more hybrid batteries. Detroit Free Press, 2007-03-14. Retrieved on 2007-08-06.
^ Ovonic Materials Division — NiMH Battery JV Overview ECD Ovonics. Retrieved on 2007-08-08.
^ "Archived copy". Archived from the original on April 1, 2012. Retrieved September 23, 2011. 
^ [1] Archived April 1, 2012, at the Wayback Machine.
^ "www.prnewswire.com". 
^ Boschert, S. (2007) Plug-in Hybrids: The Cars that Will Recharge America (Gabriola Island, BC: New Society Publishers) ISBN 978-0-86571-571-4
^ Brigis, Alvis (October 14, 2008). "The Edison of our Age: Stan Ovshinsky and the Future of Energy [Video Interview Part 1]". The Energy Roadmap. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ ECD Ovonics 10-Q Quarterly Report Archived July 28, 2009, at the Wayback Machine. for the period ending March 31, 2008
^ "Mercedes sues Cobasys over battery deal". Automotive News. Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ https://www.bloomberg.com/apps/news?pid=newsarchive&sid=ai_WuJj0.LLU
^ a b "Transcript of Drilling and Killing Documentary". Democracy Now!. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ Egelko, Bob (August 15, 2007). "Chevron can be sued for attacks on Nigerians, U.S. judge rules". The San Francisco Chronicle. 
^ "S.F. jury clears Chevron of protest shootings". SFGate. December 2, 2008. Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ Ewen MacAskill in Washington (December 15, 2010). "WikiLeaks cables: Chevron discussed oil project with Tehran, claims Iraqi PM | World news". London: The Guardian. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ "US embassy cables: Iraqi PM claims US oil company in contact with Iran | Business | guardian.co.uk". London: Guardian. December 15, 2010. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ "CHEVRON RICHMOND REFINERY TO PAY $540,000 ENVIRONMENTAL PENALTY | Newsroom | US EPA". Yosemite.epa.gov. October 15, 1998. Retrieved February 16, 2011. 
^ "Responsible Shopper Profile: Chevron". COOP America. Archived from the original on 2006-06-21. 
^ "EXPLOSION, FIRE AT CHEVRON REFINERY RESTRICT WEST COAST OIL PRODUCTION". The Boston Globe. Boston. April 12, 1989. 
^ "Chevron Fined for Its Failure To Equip Firefighting Workers". The Washington Post. Washington, D.C. September 27, 1989. 
^ "Huge explosion rocks Richmond oil refinery". San Francisco Chronicle. March 26, 1999. Retrieved 8 August 2012. 
^ Bender, Kristin J.; Jimenez, Daniel M. (August 6, 2012). "Massive fire at Chevron refinery in Richmond fully contained; shelter in place lifted". Contra Costa Times. 
^ Bender, Kristin J.; Jimenez, Daniel M. (August 6, 2012). "Massive fire at Chevron refinery in Richmond fully contained; shelter in place lifted". San Jose Mercury News. Retrieved August 8, 2012. 
^ Jaxon Van Derbeken (August 20, 2012). "Chevron refinery fire a 'close call'". San Francisco Chronicle. Retrieved August 21, 2012.
^ a b "Chevron to Pay $2 Million for 2012 Refinery Fire in Richmond, CA; 200 Arrested at Protest". Democracy Now!. August 6, 2013. Retrieved August 6, 2013. It was one year ago when a massive fire at a Chevron refinery in Richmond, California, sent toxic smoke billowing into the air about 10 miles northeast of San Francisco. In the aftermath, more than 15,000 people sought medical treatment for respiratory problems. On Monday, Chevron pleaded no contest to six criminal charges related to the fire and agreed to submit to additional oversight over the next few years and pay $2 million in fines and restitution as part of a plea deal with state and county prosecutors. Two days earlier, thousands of people marched to condemn safety issues at Chevron’s plant and to call for renewable alternatives to fossil fuels. 
^ "Chevron pays $2m fines and pleads no contest to Richmond fire charges". Associated Press report appearing in The Guardian. 5 August 2013. Retrieved 6 August 2013. 
^ "Chevron Takes Responsibility for Brazil Oil Spill, May Face $51M Fine". Foxnews.com. November 21, 2011. Archived from the original on 2011-11-21. Retrieved October 22, 2015. 
^ "Chevron takes full responsibility for Brazil oil spill". BBC.co.uk. November 11, 2011. 
^ "Chevron faces $10.6bn Brazil legal suit over oil spill". BBC News. December 14, 2011. On March 16, 2012 the Brazilian Federal Justice prohibited 17 key people (including George Buck and other foreigners) connected to Chevron Brazil from leaving the country without judicial permission because of evident guilt on the 2011 oil spills. 
^ "Chevron and Brazil Reach Deal on Oil Spill - NYTimes.com". 
^ "Chevron to pay $155 million for Brazil oil spill". 
^ "Exclusive: Riggers sought evacuation before deadly Chevron blast". Reuters. July 11, 2012. 
^ Schmidt, Kathrine (January 17, 2012). "Chevron prepares to drill Nigeria relief well". Upstream Online. NHST Media Group. (subscription required). Retrieved January 24, 2012. 
^ "Chevron suspends survey after fire in Bangladesh". 
^ "Chevron resumes survey after fire in Bangladesh | Reuters". 
^ "Blokuj badania ws. ³upków? Chevron pozywa mieszkañców Lubelszczyzny. 'To jest wojna'". gazetapl. Archived from the original on 2015-04-02. Retrieved April 4, 2014. 
^ Polish TVP interview and material about gas exploration in Poland, first broadcast in Wiadomosci, on 7-11-2013
^ "Przez łupki premier Tusk może stracić działkę". Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ a b "Protests against Chevron highlight Argentine energy woes - CSMonitor.com". 
^ "Página/12 :: Economía :: Balas, gases y represión". Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ "Masiva marcha en Neuquén en contra del acuerdo por Vaca Muerta". Clarin.com. Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ "The Argentina Independent - Tag Archive - YPF". Retrieved September 20, 2014. 
^ "Public Eye Awards". publiceye.ch. Public Eye. Archived from the original on 2015-11-04. Retrieved 2017-03-27. 
^ "The Public Eye Awards 2006 go to Chevron, Disney and Citigroup". publiceye.ch. Public Eye. 2006-01-25. Retrieved 2017-03-27. 
^ Pylas, Pan (2015-01-23). "Chevron slams mock award". usnews.com. U.S. News and World Report. Retrieved 2017-03-27. Chevron was responsible for one of the world's worst-ever environmental disasters in the Ecuador rainforest 
^ http://amazonwatch.org/assets/files/2014-chevrons-threat-to-open-society.pdf
^ Elena Cherney (September 13, 2016). "Companies Might Have to Disclose Their Carbon-Related Risks; New regulations could require firms to disclose risks tied to climate change". WSJ. Retrieved September 27, 2016. 


External links[edit]



Wikimedia Commons has media related to Chevron (company).



Official website





Business data for Chevron Corporation: Google Finance
Yahoo! Finance
Reuters
SEC filings







Authority control



WorldCat Identities
VIAF: 150159455












v
t
e


Chevron Corporation



Petroleum brands



Caltex
Chevron
Citgo
Texaco





Technology



Clarity
Delo
Havoline
Techron





Acquisition



Unocal Corporation
Texaco, Inc





Related



Petroleum Industry
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Supermajor












v
t
e


Petroleum industry






Petroleum
Primary energy









Benchmarks



Argus Sour
Bonny Light
Brent
Dubai
Indonesian
Isthmus-34 Light
Japan Cocktail
OPEC Reference Basket
Tapis
Urals
Western Canadian Select
West Texas Intermediate





Data




Natural gas



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price





Petroleum



Consumption
Production
Reserves
Imports
Exports
Price (of gasoline and diesel)








Exploration



Core sampling
Geophysics
Integrated asset modelling
Petroleum engineering

Reservoir simulation
Seismic to simulation


Petroleum geology
Petrophysics
Reflection seismology (Seismic inversion)
Seismic source





Drilling



Blowout
Completion (Squeeze job)
Differential sticking
Directional drilling (Geosteering)
Drilling engineering
Drilling fluid (invasion)
Drill stem test
Lost circulation
Measurement
Tracers
Underbalanced drilling
Well logging





Production



Petroleum fiscal regime

Concessions
Production sharing agreements


Artificial lift

Pumpjack
Submersible pump (ESP)
Gas lift


Downstream
Enhanced oil recovery (EOR)

Steam injection
Gas reinjection


Midstream
Petroleum product
Pipeline transport
Refining
Upstream
Water injection
Well intervention
XT





History



1967 Oil Embargo
1973 oil crisis
1979 energy crisis
1980s oil glut
1990 oil price shock
2000s energy crisis
2010s oil glut
Founders
History of the petroleum industry
Nationalization
OPEC
GECF
Seven Sisters
Standard Oil
Oil market timelines





Provinces
and fields



List of natural gas fields
List of oil fields
East Midlands Oil Province
East Texas
Gulf of Mexico
Niger Delta
North Sea
Permian Basin
Persian Gulf
Prudhoe Bay Oil Field
Russia
Venezuela
Western Canadian Sedimentary Basin





Other topics



Acronyms
Oil shale gas
Peak oil

mitigation
timing


People
Petrocurrency
Petrodollar recycling
Shale gas
Swing producer
Unconventional oil

heavy crude
oil sands
oil shale















Companies and organisations








Major petroleum
companies





Supermajors



BP
Chevron
Eni
ExxonMobil
Royal Dutch Shell
Total






National oil
companies




ADNOC (UAE)
CNOOC (China)
CNPC (China)
Ecopetrol (Colombia)
Gazprom (Russia)
Iraq National Oil Company
Indian Oil Corporation
KazMunayGas (Kazakhstan)
Kuwait Petroleum Corporation
Lotos (Poland)
Nigerian National Petroleum Corporation
NIOC (Iran)
NISOC (Iran)
OGDCL (Pakistan)
ONGC (India)
PDVSA (Venezuela)
PKN Orlen (Poland)
Pemex (Mexico)
Pertamina (Indonesia)
PetroBangla (Bangladesh)
Petrobras (Brazil)
PetroChina
Petronas (Malaysia)
Petrovietnam
PTT (Thailand)
Qatar Petroleum
Rosneft (Russia)
Saudi Aramco (Saudi Arabia)
Sinopec (China)
SOCAR (Azerbaijan)
Sonangol (Angola)
Sonatrach (Algeria)
Statoil (Norway)
TPAO (Turkey)
YPF (Argentina)





Energy trading



Glencore
Gunvor
Mercuria
Naftiran Intertrade
Trafigura
Vitol





Other



Anadarko
Apache
BG Group
Cenovus Energy
Compañía Española de Petróleos
ConocoPhillips
Devon
Galp Energia
Hess
Husky Energy
Imperial Oil
Lukoil
Marathon Oil
Nippon Oil
Occidental
OMV
Port Harcourt Refining Company
Reliance Industries
Repsol
Suncor Energy
Surgutneftegas
TNK-BP
Tullow Oil
Tüpraş









Major services
companies




Amec Foster Wheeler
Baker Hughes
Cameron
CGG
CH2M Hill
Chicago Bridge & Iron Company
China Oilfield Services
Enbridge
Ensco
GE Oil & Gas
Halliburton
Nabors Industries
Naftiran Intertrade
National Oilwell Varco
Petrofac
Saipem
Schlumberger
Snam
Subsea 7
TransCanada
Transocean
Weatherford
Wood Group





Other



International Association of Oil & Gas Producers
International Energy Agency
International Petroleum Exchange
OPEC
Society of Petroleum Engineers
World Petroleum Council














Category
 Commons












v
t
e


Components of the Dow Jones Industrial Average






3M
American Express
Apple
Boeing
Caterpillar
Chevron
Cisco Systems
Coca-Cola
Disney
DuPont
ExxonMobil
General Electric
Goldman Sachs
The Home Depot
Intel
IBM
Johnson & Johnson
JPMorgan Chase
McDonald's
Merck & Co.
Microsoft
Nike
Pfizer
Procter & Gamble
Travelers
UnitedHealth Group
United Technologies
Verizon Communications
Visa
Walmart










 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Chevron_Corporation&oldid=790919812"					
Categories: Chevron CorporationMultinational oil companiesOil companies of the United StatesChemical companies of the United StatesAlgal fuel producersAutomotive fuel brandsGas stations in CanadaGas stations in the United StatesCompanies based in San FranciscoCompanies based in San Ramon, CaliforniaAutomotive companies of the United StatesMultinational companies headquartered in the United StatesPetroleum in CaliforniaPeabody Award winnersCompanies in the Dow Jones Industrial AverageCompanies listed on the New York Stock ExchangeEnergy companies established in 1879Non-renewable resource companies established in 1879American companies established in 18791879 establishments in CaliforniaHidden categories: Pages containing links to subscription-only contentPages with URL errorsWebarchive template wayback linksUse mdy dates from September 2013Pages using deprecated image syntaxArticles containing potentially dated statements from 2014All articles containing potentially dated statementsAll articles with unsourced statementsArticles with unsourced statements from March 2013Articles with unsourced statements from July 2013Articles with unsourced statements from August 2013All articles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrasesArticles with specifically marked weasel-worded phrases from March 2015Articles needing additional references from March 2015All articles needing additional referencesAll articles lacking reliable referencesArticles lacking reliable references from March 2015Wikipedia articles with VIAF identifiers 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



In other projects


Wikimedia Commons 



Languages


العربيةAzərbaycancaBân-lâm-gúБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEestiEspañolفارسیFrançais客家語/Hak-kâ-ngî한국어हिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaItalianoעבריתҚазақшаLatinaLietuviųമലയാളംNederlands日本語Norsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSimple EnglishSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSuomiSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinaray粵語中文 
Edit links 





 This page was last edited on 16 July 2017, at 23:51.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









雪佛龍 - 维基百科，自由的百科全书































 






雪佛龍

维基百科，自由的百科全书


					跳转至：					导航、					搜索



雪佛龍股份有限公司
Chevron Corporation









公司類型
公有股份（NYSE：CVX）


成立
1879年（美國加州Pico Canyon）


代表人物
戴維·奧萊利（David O'Reilly），執行長兼主席
史蒂夫·克羅（Steve Crowe），財務長


總部
美國加州聖拉蒙（San Ramon）


产业
石油石化


產品
石化


營業額
▲ US$ 2537億6百萬美金 (2011)[1]


息税前利润
▲ US$ 476億3千4百萬美金 (2011)[1]


净利润
▲ US$ 268億9千5百萬美金 (2011)[1]


總資產
▲ US$ 2094億7千4百萬美金 (2011)[1]


資產淨值
▲ US$ 1213億8千2百1十萬美金 (2011)[1]


員工人數
62,000 (2010)


网站
www.chevron.com


雪佛龍股份有限公司（英文：Chevron Corporation，NYSE：CVX）是世界最大的全球能源公司之一，總部位於美國加州聖拉蒙市（San Ramon）並在全球超過180個國家有業務。其業務範圍滲透石油及天然氣工業的各個方面：探測、生產、提煉、營銷、運輸、石化、發電等。雪佛龍原名加利福尼亞標準石油（Standard Oil of California，簡稱Socal），是1911年標準石油由於反托拉斯案分裂的結果。雪佛龍曾是20世紀初期統治世界石油工業的「七姊妹」之一。 2001年10月，雪佛龙以390亿美元兼并了其主要竞争对手之一德士古，并以雪佛龙-德士古（ChevronTexaco）作为公司的名称。2005年5月9日雪佛龙德士古宣布，更名为“雪佛龙公司”。



目录


1 历史
2 新政策和发展
3 市场品牌

3.1 燃油
3.2 便利店
3.3 润滑油
3.4 燃油添加剂


4 參考文獻
5 外部链接



历史[编辑]
2004年雪佛龙庆祝公司成立125周年。最早，雪佛龙的历史可以追溯到洛杉矶北部的碧可峡谷（现在是碧可峡谷油田）发现原油。这一发现导致了1879年雪佛龙公司最早的前身太平洋海岸石油公司的成立。另外一个前身是于1901年在德州波蒙特一个波纹铁皮建筑物裡的三个屋子中成立的德州燃料公司。该公司看起来很朴素，后来成为闻名的德士古。
雪佛龙集团起初叫加州标准石油，或者简称SoCal，成立于约翰·D·洛克菲勒反垄断拆分期间的1911年。曾是20世纪早期控制美国石油工业的“七姐妹”之一。1933年，沙特阿拉伯赋予加州标准石油探油权，并在1938年发现了原油。1950年代早期，加州标准石油在沙特发现了世界上最大的加瓦尔油田。加州标准石油的子公司，加州-阿拉伯标准石油发展数年后于1944年成为阿拉伯美国石油公司（简称：阿美）。1973年，沙特政府开始收购阿美。到1980年，整个阿美归沙特所有，并于1988年更名为沙特阿拉伯石油公司（简称：沙特阿美）。
加州标准石油于1984年和海湾石油合并，成为当时历史上最大的购并案。在反垄断条例下，加州标准石油剥离了许多海湾石油的子公司，并把海湾石油的加油站和一个设在美国东部的炼油厂出售。加州标准石油更名为雪佛龙集团。[2] 1992年6月，达力智公司（NYSE: DYN）因雪佛龙的天然气和液化天然气业务和达力智的前身Natural Gas Clearinghouse公司（NYSE: NGC）。NGC在1994年成为综合天然气服务公司。[3] 2000年2月1日完成的一项购并案，伊利诺娃公司（NYSE: ILN）成为达力智公司旗下全资子公司，雪佛龙占有其28%的股份。[3]
2001年，雪佛龙集团兼并了德士古成为雪佛龙-德士古。2005年5月9日，雪佛龙德士古宣布放弃德士古一名，重新改回雪佛龙，而德士古依然是雪佛龙集团的一个品牌。2005年8月19日，雪佛龙并购了美国加州联合公司（优尼科），并因为优尼科在东南亚的大量地热开发而成为世界上最大的地热能源商。[4]
雪佛龙于2007年与中国石油天然气集团公司（中石油）签订了一项为期30年的天然气合作开发项目，雪佛龙（优尼科中国东海有限公司）作为作业方占有49%股份，中石油作为甲方占有51%股份。天然气项目位于中国四川省东北部地区（四川省宣汉县和重庆市开县）。项目于2008年组建，2009年开始修井，一开始预计2010年投产。但是这个项目由于各种各样的原因，进展十分缓慢。截至2012年底，没有新钻一口井，新的天然气净化厂也还在建设中（估计完成60%），管道铺设仍在进行中，首气遥遥无期。
新政策和发展[编辑]




雪佛龙在加州费尔罗斯500千瓦光伏项目


雪佛龙已经逐步开始减少温室气体排放，来获得更清洁的能源。[5]在美国的石油公司中，雪佛龙因为在可替代能源方面的巨大投资并定下目标来减少温室气体排放而获得了最高的评价。[5]雪佛龙为全球地热能最大生产商，所产生的能源足可供应给超过七百万家庭使用.[6]
市场品牌[编辑]




2006年前典型的雪佛龙加油站标志.






2006年雪佛龙开始逐步采用的加油站标志


燃油[编辑]

雪佛龙
标准石油 (有限条件)
德士古
加德士
海湾
优尼科
Dinoco

便利店[编辑]

Star Mart
Extra Mile
Redwood Market
Town Pantry

润滑油[编辑]

Delo (sold by Caltex and Chevron)
Havoline (sold by Caltex and Texaco)
Revtex (sold by Caltex)
Ursa (sold by Texaco)

燃油添加剂[编辑]

Techron - Chevron, Texaco (phased in during 2005), Caltex (phased in during 2006 and later)
Techron concentrate plus
Clean System 3 - Texaco (phased out during 2005 in favor of Techron)
PE Purescape

參考文獻[编辑]


^ 1.0 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 4Q11 Earnings Release. Chevron Corporation. 2011-02-24. 
^ Chevron Products Homepage
^ 3.0 3.1 CHEVRON CORP. APPLAUDS DYNEGY-ILLINOVA MERGER 互联网档案馆的存檔，存档日期2007-09-29., Chevron Press Release Archives, February 2, 2000
^ Chevron claims energy debate, BBC News, 2006-02-19  引文格式1维护：日期与年 (link)
^ 5.0 5.1 Quest for clean energy / Chevron, PG&E cited for positive steps to combat global warming
^ Chevron - Chevron Stories










查
论
编


 道琼斯工业平均指数成份股






目前組成股票



3M
蘋果公司
高盛
美國運通
Visa
波音
卡特彼勒
雪佛龍
思科系统
可口可乐公司
杜邦
埃克森美孚
通用电气
耐克
家得宝
英特尔
IBM
强生
摩根大通
麦当劳
默沙东
微软
輝瑞
宝洁
旅行家集團
聯合健康集團
联合技术
威訊
沃尔玛
华特迪士尼








前任組成股票



奧馳亞集團
卡夫食品
美國國際集團
美国烟草公司
花旗集团
通用汽车
伊士曼柯达
固特異
霍尼韦尔
國際紙業公司
北美洲公司
西爾斯羅巴克
美國聯合碳化物
美國橡膠公司
美國鋁業
惠普
AT&T
美國銀行








外部链接[编辑]

官方网站





 
						取自“https://zh.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=雪佛龍&oldid=45380754”					
分类：纽约证券交易所上市公司道瓊斯工業平均指數成份股1879年成立的公司美国石油公司跨国公司美国能源公司加德士隐藏分类：调用重复模板参数的页面Webarchive模板wayback链接引文格式1维护：日期与年使用过时图像语法的页面含有英語的條目维基百科和维基数据上的官方网站不同 



导航菜单


个人工具

没有登录讨论贡献创建账户登录 



命名空间

条目
讨论




不转换



不转换
简体
繁體
大陆简体
香港繁體
澳門繁體
马新简体
台灣正體






视图

阅读
编辑
查看历史



更多







搜索



 







导航


首页分类索引特色内容新闻动态最近更改随机条目 



帮助


帮助维基社群方针与指引互助客栈知识问答字词转换IRC即时聊天联络我们关于维基百科资助维基百科 



在其他项目中


维基共享资源 



打印/导出


下载为PDF 



工具


链入页面相关更改上传文件特殊页面打印页面固定链接页面信息维基数据项引用本页 



其他语言


العربيةAzərbaycancaБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEnglishEspañolEestiفارسیSuomiFrançais客家語/Hak-kâ-ngîעבריתहिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaItaliano日本語Қазақша한국어LatinaLietuviųമലയാളംNederlandsNorsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSimple EnglishSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinarayBân-lâm-gú粵語 
编辑链接 





 本页面最后修订于2017年7月26日 (星期三) 20:02。
本站的全部文字在知识共享 署名-相同方式共享 3.0协议之条款下提供，附加条款亦可能应用。（请参阅使用条款）
Wikipedia®和维基百科标志是维基媒体基金会的注册商标；维基™是维基媒体基金会的商标。
维基媒体基金会是在美国佛罗里达州登记的501(c)(3)免税、非营利、慈善机构。


隐私政策
关于维基百科
免责声明
开发者
Cookie声明
手机版视图



 

 









Products and Services — Chevron.com



























































skip to main content










products and services

                    we produce safe, reliable energy products for people around the world
                












                    our brands
                






 

                    Chevron
                


For more than 100 years, we've been committed to superior product performance and high-quality care for your car.

 Chevronvisit the  Chevron brand site





 

                    Texaco
                


After more than a century, Texaco still stands for  heritage, performance  and trustworthiness.

 Texacovisit the Texaco brand site





 

                    Caltex
                


Around the world, 
Caltex strives to meet 
its customers’ needs 
without compromise.

 Caltexvisit the Caltex brand site









                    for motorists
                







Fuels & Stations

 learn more






Gift & Credit Cards

 learn more






Lubricants & Fuel Additives

 learn more









                    for businesses
                







Additives

 learn more






Aviation

 learn more






Chemicals

 learn more






Fuels

 learn more










Lubricants

 learn more






Marine

 learn more






Base Oils & Process Oils

 learn more







material safety data sheets for fuels and lubricants




                    business opportunities
                
Chevron®, Texaco® and Caltex® service stations offer unsurpassed brand recognition, an unwavering commitment to customer satisfaction and a higher standard of doing business known as The Chevron Way.







chevron station ownership

 learn more






texaco station ownership

 learn more






caltex investor ownership

 learn more





 


previous: transportation



 next: fuels and stations







downloads






2016 Annual Report







2016 Corporate Responsibility Report







The Chevron Way - English





more resources

Supplier Diversity











share this page:




















Contact — Chevron.com



























































skip to main content










contact us

                    we’re one of the world’s leading integrated energy companies
                







chevron headquarters
6001 Bollinger Canyon Road

San Ramon, CA 94583, USA 
Telephone: +1 925.842.1000




global contacts
Find contact information for the countries where we operate.
visit chevron worldwide






email chevron




                    popular inquiries
                






job seekers
Become part of the Chevron team.

visit job seekers




motorists
Locate a station near you or send feedback about your recent visit.

visit motorists




media
Resources and information for journalists.

visit media 








investors
Learn more about investing in Chevron. 
visit investors




human resources
Find information about employee/retiree benefits and employment verification. 
visit human resources




pipeline information
Learn more about Chevron’s pipeline system, including right-of-way issues. 
chevron pipe line company








                    important topic information
                









                            pipelines
                        




contact us

Chevron Pipe Line Company operates pipelines that transport crude oil, refined petroleum products, liquefied petroleum gas, natural gas and chemicals within the United States.
visit the chevron pipe line company website

Call before you dig
The primary cause of pipeline accidents is damage from excavation-related activities, particularly from equipment digging into pipelines. If you are planning to dig on your property or perform excavation work, please call your local One-Call Center.
Telephone: 811







                            request an MSDS
                        




contact us
Material Safety Data Sheets (MSDS)
MSDS for motor gasoline, diesel, aviation and asphalt are available.
request an MSDS

Find a material safety data sheet (MSDS) or product data sheet (PDS) for our products.
access the MSDS database







                            fuels – technical questions
                        




contact us
Gasoline
Chevron, Texaco and Caltex gasolines with Techron are designed to deliver lower emissions, higher performance and a cleaner engine.
learn more about chevron fuels
learn more about techron 

For technical questions about our fuels, please contact us.
telephone: +1 510.242.5357







                            diesel
                        




contact us
Diesel
Chevron's Ultra-Low Sulfur Diesel (ULSD) is available at stations across the United States.
diesel for consumers and commercial







                            financial publication request
                        




contact us
For address changes, inquiries about Chevron stock and dividend reinvestment programs, please contact our Stock Transfer Agent:

For stockholder correspondence:
Computershare
P.O. BOX 505000
Louisville, KY 40233-5000

For overnight mail:
Computershare
462 South 4th Street
Suite 1600
Louisville, KY 40202

Toll free number: +1 800.368.8357
Outside the U.S.: +1 201.680.6578



request copies of our financial publications
shareholder website
shareholder online inquiries







                            lubricants – technical information
                        




contact us
Technical information
Chevron Global Lubricants provides advanced products for industrial, commercial and consumer applications.

For information about a specific product, please contact us.
telephone: 1.800.582.3835







                            lubricants - where to buy
                        




contact us
Business opportunities
Locate a source for our products in your area.
chevron lubricants locator
If you are interested in providing quality Chevron products in your local community, please contact us.







                            mineral rights and royalties
                        




contact us
Land department
The Land Department handles changes in ownership, address changes and property divisions.
Chevron North America Exploration and Production
Attn: land department
PO Box 4538
Houston, TX 77210-4538
Fax: 866.819.1448

Owner relations
Owner Relations provides information about royalty payments to private royalty owners.
Chevron U.S.A. Inc.
P. O. Box 4791
Houston, TX 77210-4791
Telephone: 1.866.212.1212







                            scams
                        




contact us
Individuals claiming to represent Chevron or one of its many subsidiaries have approached people in a variety of fraudulent business transactions.
While Chevron has contacted law enforcement agencies regarding these kinds of activities, it is often difficult to locate and prosecute the perpetrators. Anyone receiving one of these offers should report the matter to the appropriate law enforcement agency.
We sincerely regret any inconvenience caused by these individuals, and we hope the following explanations will be helpful. Please note that the information below is a sampling of the various frauds being attempted; new versions of fraud are frequently reported.
Chevron and Texaco promotion scam
Individuals will claim to manage or run a promotion offered by Chevron or a subsidiary and ask potential participants to fill out a simple entry form. Alternatively, individuals will claim to offer proceeds in exchange for an “insurance payment.” They will claim that the promotion was sponsored by Chevron or a subsidiary.
If an insurance payment is requested, victims are usually requested to send the insurance payment via personal check or a money order. This particular kind of activity is called Advance Fee Fraud or 419 Fraud. Neither Chevron Corporation nor any of its subsidiaries offer proceeds in exchange for insurance payments. Whether or not a payment is requested to enter the promotion, Chevron is not associated with the individuals offering these insurance payments or with the individuals who claim to manage or run the promotion. These are not valid offers.
Chevron online endowment fund award scam
Victims will be approached by individuals claiming to represent the Chevron Online Endowment Award Fund (COEFA) as a potential beneficiary of a cash prize. Potential “winners” may be asked to fill out an entry form.
In order to receive their “prize,” victims may be requested to send an insurance payment via personal check or a money order. This particular kind of activity is called Advance Fee Fraud or 419 Fraud. Neither Chevron Corporation nor any of its subsidiaries offer donations or grants in exchange for insurance payments. Whether or not a payment is requested, Chevron is not associated with the individuals offering these insurance payments or with the individuals who claim to manage or run the program. These are not valid offers.
Deceased employee inquiry scam
Victims will be approached by individuals claiming to represent the estate of a deceased Chevron employee. These individuals will claim the employee died without any heirs and, for a fee, will offer to transfer the inheritance to the victim.
Fictitious job offer scam
Individuals will claim they are under contract with Chevron or a subsidiary to locate prospective employees for work on projects.
These offers usually are sent via email and will typically advise the victims they either have been hired by the company or may obtain employment with the company, and for a fee (the amount varies from $100 to as much as several thousand dollars), the individual will process the victim’s employment papers, tender offers, job applications and work permits. Victims are usually requested to send their fees, via a personal check or a money order, to a post office box either in the United States or another country. In some instances, victims are promised or receive checks to cover relocation expenses. Such promises and/or checks are not made or generated by Chevron or in any way associated with Chevron.
This particular kind of activity is called Advance Fee Fraud or 419 Fraud. Chevron does not seek fees for securing positions with the company from either prospective employees or contractors. These are not legitimate Chevron job offers.
If you should receive such an offer, we ask that you report the matter to the U.S. Secret Service.
Grant and donation scam
Victims will be approached by individuals claiming to represent Chevron or Chevron/Texaco Exploration and Production as the recipient of a cash grant or donation. They will ask potential “winners” to fill out an entry form.
If an insurance payment is requested, victims are usually requested to send the insurance payment via personal check or a money order. This particular kind of activity is called Advance Fee Fraud or 419 Fraud. Neither Chevron Corporation nor any of its subsidiaries offer donations or grants in exchange for insurance payments. Whether or not a payment is requested to enter the program, Chevron is not associated with the individuals offering these insurance payments or with the individuals who claim to manage or run the donation/grant program. These are not valid offers.
Lottery winner scam
Individuals will claim to manage or run a lottery offered by Chevron or a subsidiary and ask potential participants to fill out a simple entry form. Alternatively, individuals will claim to offer lottery proceeds in exchange for an “insurance payment.” They will claim that the lottery was sponsored by Chevron or a subsidiary.
If an insurance payment is requested, victims are usually requested to send the insurance payment via personal check or a money order. This particular kind of activity is called Advance Fee Fraud or 419 Fraud. Neither Chevron Corporation nor any of its subsidiaries offer lottery proceeds in exchange for insurance payments. Whether or not a payment is requested to enter the lottery, Chevron is not associated with the individuals offering these insurance payments or with the individuals who claim to manage or run the lottery. These are not valid offer.
Procurement scam
Vendors will be approached by individuals claiming to represent Chevron or a subsidiary. These individuals usually work by email and will advise the victim that they are being invited to bid for a large equipment or supply order. They are then asked to pay a qualification fee.
This particular kind of fraudulent activity is called “Advance Fee Fraud” or 419 Fraud. Chevron does not seek fees for doing business with the company. These are not valid offers. If you should receive such an offer, we ask that you report the matter to the U.S. Secret Service or to your local law enforcement agency.







                            supplier relations
                        





Assistance
For assistance, email Supplier Relations. An email response can be expected within three business days.
email supplier relations
Check status
To check the status of invoices and payments online, visit the Chevron Invoice and Payment Status (CIPS) system.
visit the CIPS site

















	
    Product Summaries | Chevron Phillips Chemical





















































































Toggle navigation














Toggle search









Search this site












Contact UsCredit InquirySDSTDSLogin












                                        OK
                                    


















Chevron Phillips ChemicalEnvironment, Health & SafetyProduct Summaries




 Print
                            













Page Image






Page ContentProduct Summaries
As part of our ongoing efforts to ensure the continued safe handling and use of our products, a multi-disciplinary team at Chevron Phillips Chemical reviews our product portfolio for product stewardship purposes. This evergreen process includes a review of the associated hazard communication documents, transportation options, customer feedback, regulatory and technical data.
Our product portfolio review is prioritized based on a weighted composite score of environmental fate, end use, physical and human hazards, regulatory profile, distribution exposure, production volume, public perception aspects and marketing aspects.
In order to facilitate a more transparent process and to enhance communication within the product stewardship chain, our Product Stewardship Summaries for all of our products will be made public for all interested parties on this site as they become available.
If a Product Summary is not listed for your product below, check back periodically for updates. For questions or comments regarding Product Summaries or any other regulatory compliance questions, please use our Regulatory and Compliance Inquiries form. 
Thank you for your continued product stewardship partnership,
William S. Utley, Ph.D., DABTManager, Product Safety & Toxicology  




Aromatics


              Aromax® Process Components
            




              Benzene
            




              Cyclohexane 
            




              PARAXYLENE
            




              STYRENE
            

Drilling Specialties


              Combustible Liquids
            




              Group 3 Crystalline Silica-Containing Products
            




              MISCELLANEOUS
            




              Lignosulfonates Liquids Group
            




              Aqueous Solutions Group
            




              Surfactants Group
            




              Polynaphthalene Sulfonates and Blends
            




              Cellulosics and Biopolymers Groups
            




              Natural Fibers and Plant Materials
            




              Water-Soluble Synthetic Polymers Group
            

Normal Alpha Olefins


              Normal Alpha Olefins
            




              Spent Caustic
            

Olefins


              Acetylene
            




              Butadiene Feedstock
            




              Benzene, Toluene, Xylene Mixture (BTX)
            




              Crude Dicyclopentadiene (DCPD)
            




              Crude Hydrogen
            




              Debutanized Aromatic Concentrate
            




              Ethylene Fuel Oil
            




              Ethylene
            




              Heavy Aromatic Distillate (HAD)
            




              Heavy Pyrolysis Oil and Light Pyrolysis Oil
            




              Hydrogen Rich Gas
            




              Isoprene Feedstock
            




              Light NGL Products 
            




              Propylene
            




              Raw NGL Heavy NGL
            




              Refinery Fuel Gas
            

Polyalphaoelfins


              mPAO Synfluid
            




              Synfluid® PAO 4 - 9 cSt 
            




              SYNFLUID PAO dimers category (Dimer C10, Dimer C12, C10/C12 Dimer blend, PAO 2 cSt, PAO 2.5 cSt)
            

Polyethylene


              Marlex Polyethylene
            

Specialty Chemicals


              C2-C4 Organosulfur Specialty Products
            




              C8-C12 Mercaptan Products
            




              Diesel Product Group
            




              Mining Specialty Products
            




              Organo Sulfur Group
            




              E-III® Fire Training Fluids
            




              High-Purity Hydrocarbons 
            




              MeSH  NaMeSH
            




              Performance Fuels Group 
            




              Reference Fuels Group 
            




              TrackTek® Racing Fuels 
            




              2-Methyl-2-Butene
            




              Sulfides, Disulfides, Polysulfides
            






Page Content 2 



Page Image 2














































雪佛龍 - 维基百科，自由的百科全书































 






雪佛龍

维基百科，自由的百科全书


					跳转至：					导航、					搜索



雪佛龍股份有限公司
Chevron Corporation









公司類型
公有股份（NYSE：CVX）


成立
1879年（美國加州Pico Canyon）


代表人物
戴維·奧萊利（David O'Reilly），執行長兼主席
史蒂夫·克羅（Steve Crowe），財務長


總部
美國加州聖拉蒙（San Ramon）


产业
石油石化


產品
石化


營業額
▲ US$ 2537億6百萬美金 (2011)[1]


息税前利润
▲ US$ 476億3千4百萬美金 (2011)[1]


净利润
▲ US$ 268億9千5百萬美金 (2011)[1]


總資產
▲ US$ 2094億7千4百萬美金 (2011)[1]


資產淨值
▲ US$ 1213億8千2百1十萬美金 (2011)[1]


員工人數
62,000 (2010)


网站
www.chevron.com


雪佛龍股份有限公司（英文：Chevron Corporation，NYSE：CVX）是世界最大的全球能源公司之一，總部位於美國加州聖拉蒙市（San Ramon）並在全球超過180個國家有業務。其業務範圍滲透石油及天然氣工業的各個方面：探測、生產、提煉、營銷、運輸、石化、發電等。雪佛龍原名加利福尼亞標準石油（Standard Oil of California，簡稱Socal），是1911年標準石油由於反托拉斯案分裂的結果。雪佛龍曾是20世紀初期統治世界石油工業的「七姊妹」之一。 2001年10月，雪佛龙以390亿美元兼并了其主要竞争对手之一德士古，并以雪佛龙-德士古（ChevronTexaco）作为公司的名称。2005年5月9日雪佛龙德士古宣布，更名为“雪佛龙公司”。



目录


1 历史
2 新政策和发展
3 市场品牌

3.1 燃油
3.2 便利店
3.3 润滑油
3.4 燃油添加剂


4 參考文獻
5 外部链接



历史[编辑]
2004年雪佛龙庆祝公司成立125周年。最早，雪佛龙的历史可以追溯到洛杉矶北部的碧可峡谷（现在是碧可峡谷油田）发现原油。这一发现导致了1879年雪佛龙公司最早的前身太平洋海岸石油公司的成立。另外一个前身是于1901年在德州波蒙特一个波纹铁皮建筑物裡的三个屋子中成立的德州燃料公司。该公司看起来很朴素，后来成为闻名的德士古。
雪佛龙集团起初叫加州标准石油，或者简称SoCal，成立于约翰·D·洛克菲勒反垄断拆分期间的1911年。曾是20世纪早期控制美国石油工业的“七姐妹”之一。1933年，沙特阿拉伯赋予加州标准石油探油权，并在1938年发现了原油。1950年代早期，加州标准石油在沙特发现了世界上最大的加瓦尔油田。加州标准石油的子公司，加州-阿拉伯标准石油发展数年后于1944年成为阿拉伯美国石油公司（简称：阿美）。1973年，沙特政府开始收购阿美。到1980年，整个阿美归沙特所有，并于1988年更名为沙特阿拉伯石油公司（简称：沙特阿美）。
加州标准石油于1984年和海湾石油合并，成为当时历史上最大的购并案。在反垄断条例下，加州标准石油剥离了许多海湾石油的子公司，并把海湾石油的加油站和一个设在美国东部的炼油厂出售。加州标准石油更名为雪佛龙集团。[2] 1992年6月，达力智公司（NYSE: DYN）因雪佛龙的天然气和液化天然气业务和达力智的前身Natural Gas Clearinghouse公司（NYSE: NGC）。NGC在1994年成为综合天然气服务公司。[3] 2000年2月1日完成的一项购并案，伊利诺娃公司（NYSE: ILN）成为达力智公司旗下全资子公司，雪佛龙占有其28%的股份。[3]
2001年，雪佛龙集团兼并了德士古成为雪佛龙-德士古。2005年5月9日，雪佛龙德士古宣布放弃德士古一名，重新改回雪佛龙，而德士古依然是雪佛龙集团的一个品牌。2005年8月19日，雪佛龙并购了美国加州联合公司（优尼科），并因为优尼科在东南亚的大量地热开发而成为世界上最大的地热能源商。[4]
雪佛龙于2007年与中国石油天然气集团公司（中石油）签订了一项为期30年的天然气合作开发项目，雪佛龙（优尼科中国东海有限公司）作为作业方占有49%股份，中石油作为甲方占有51%股份。天然气项目位于中国四川省东北部地区（四川省宣汉县和重庆市开县）。项目于2008年组建，2009年开始修井，一开始预计2010年投产。但是这个项目由于各种各样的原因，进展十分缓慢。截至2012年底，没有新钻一口井，新的天然气净化厂也还在建设中（估计完成60%），管道铺设仍在进行中，首气遥遥无期。
新政策和发展[编辑]




雪佛龙在加州费尔罗斯500千瓦光伏项目


雪佛龙已经逐步开始减少温室气体排放，来获得更清洁的能源。[5]在美国的石油公司中，雪佛龙因为在可替代能源方面的巨大投资并定下目标来减少温室气体排放而获得了最高的评价。[5]雪佛龙为全球地热能最大生产商，所产生的能源足可供应给超过七百万家庭使用.[6]
市场品牌[编辑]




2006年前典型的雪佛龙加油站标志.






2006年雪佛龙开始逐步采用的加油站标志


燃油[编辑]

雪佛龙
标准石油 (有限条件)
德士古
加德士
海湾
优尼科
Dinoco

便利店[编辑]

Star Mart
Extra Mile
Redwood Market
Town Pantry

润滑油[编辑]

Delo (sold by Caltex and Chevron)
Havoline (sold by Caltex and Texaco)
Revtex (sold by Caltex)
Ursa (sold by Texaco)

燃油添加剂[编辑]

Techron - Chevron, Texaco (phased in during 2005), Caltex (phased in during 2006 and later)
Techron concentrate plus
Clean System 3 - Texaco (phased out during 2005 in favor of Techron)
PE Purescape

參考文獻[编辑]


^ 1.0 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 4Q11 Earnings Release. Chevron Corporation. 2011-02-24. 
^ Chevron Products Homepage
^ 3.0 3.1 CHEVRON CORP. APPLAUDS DYNEGY-ILLINOVA MERGER 互联网档案馆的存檔，存档日期2007-09-29., Chevron Press Release Archives, February 2, 2000
^ Chevron claims energy debate, BBC News, 2006-02-19  引文格式1维护：日期与年 (link)
^ 5.0 5.1 Quest for clean energy / Chevron, PG&E cited for positive steps to combat global warming
^ Chevron - Chevron Stories










查
论
编


 道琼斯工业平均指数成份股






目前組成股票



3M
蘋果公司
高盛
美國運通
Visa
波音
卡特彼勒
雪佛龍
思科系统
可口可乐公司
杜邦
埃克森美孚
通用电气
耐克
家得宝
英特尔
IBM
强生
摩根大通
麦当劳
默沙东
微软
輝瑞
宝洁
旅行家集團
聯合健康集團
联合技术
威訊
沃尔玛
华特迪士尼








前任組成股票



奧馳亞集團
卡夫食品
美國國際集團
美国烟草公司
花旗集团
通用汽车
伊士曼柯达
固特異
霍尼韦尔
國際紙業公司
北美洲公司
西爾斯羅巴克
美國聯合碳化物
美國橡膠公司
美國鋁業
惠普
AT&T
美國銀行








外部链接[编辑]

官方网站





 
						取自“https://zh.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=雪佛龍&oldid=45380754”					
分类：纽约证券交易所上市公司道瓊斯工業平均指數成份股1879年成立的公司美国石油公司跨国公司美国能源公司加德士隐藏分类：调用重复模板参数的页面Webarchive模板wayback链接引文格式1维护：日期与年使用过时图像语法的页面含有英語的條目维基百科和维基数据上的官方网站不同 



导航菜单


个人工具

没有登录讨论贡献创建账户登录 



命名空间

条目
讨论




不转换



不转换
简体
繁體
大陆简体
香港繁體
澳門繁體
马新简体
台灣正體






视图

阅读
编辑
查看历史



更多







搜索



 







导航


首页分类索引特色内容新闻动态最近更改随机条目 



帮助


帮助维基社群方针与指引互助客栈知识问答字词转换IRC即时聊天联络我们关于维基百科资助维基百科 



在其他项目中


维基共享资源 



打印/导出


下载为PDF 



工具


链入页面相关更改上传文件特殊页面打印页面固定链接页面信息维基数据项引用本页 



其他语言


العربيةAzərbaycancaБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEnglishEspañolEestiفارسیSuomiFrançais客家語/Hak-kâ-ngîעבריתहिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaItaliano日本語Қазақша한국어LatinaLietuviųമലയാളംNederlandsNorsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSimple EnglishSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinarayBân-lâm-gú粵語 
编辑链接 





 本页面最后修订于2017年7月26日 (星期三) 20:02。
本站的全部文字在知识共享 署名-相同方式共享 3.0协议之条款下提供，附加条款亦可能应用。（请参阅使用条款）
Wikipedia®和维基百科标志是维基媒体基金会的注册商标；维基™是维基媒体基金会的商标。
维基媒体基金会是在美国佛罗里达州登记的501(c)(3)免税、非营利、慈善机构。


隐私政策
关于维基百科
免责声明
开发者
Cookie声明
手机版视图



 

 









雪佛龙 - 维基百科，自由的百科全书































 






雪佛龙

维基百科，自由的百科全书


					跳转至：					导航、					搜索



雪佛龙股份有限公司
Chevron Corporation









公司类型
公有股份（NYSE：CVX）


成立
1879年（美国加州Pico Canyon）


代表人物
戴维·奥莱利（David O'Reilly），执行长兼主席
史蒂夫·克罗（Steve Crowe），财务长


总部
美国加州圣拉蒙（San Ramon）


产业
石油石化


产品
石化


营业额
▲ US$ 2537亿6百万美金 (2011)[1]


息税前利润
▲ US$ 476亿3千4百万美金 (2011)[1]


净利润
▲ US$ 268亿9千5百万美金 (2011)[1]


总资产
▲ US$ 2094亿7千4百万美金 (2011)[1]


资产净值
▲ US$ 1213亿8千2百1十万美金 (2011)[1]


员工人数
62,000 (2010)


网站
www.chevron.com


雪佛龙股份有限公司（英文：Chevron Corporation，NYSE：CVX）是世界最大的全球能源公司之一，总部位于美国加州圣拉蒙市（San Ramon）并在全球超过180个国家有业务。其业务范围渗透石油及天然气工业的各个方面：探测、生产、提炼、营销、运输、石化、发电等。雪佛龙原名加利福尼亚标准石油（Standard Oil of California，简称Socal），是1911年标准石油由于反托拉斯案分裂的结果。雪佛龙曾是20世纪初期统治世界石油工业的“七姊妹”之一。 2001年10月，雪佛龙以390亿美元兼并了其主要竞争对手之一德士古，并以雪佛龙-德士古（ChevronTexaco）作为公司的名称。2005年5月9日雪佛龙德士古宣布，更名为“雪佛龙公司”。



目录


1 历史
2 新政策和发展
3 市场品牌

3.1 燃油
3.2 便利店
3.3 润滑油
3.4 燃油添加剂


4 参考文献
5 外部链接



历史[编辑]
2004年雪佛龙庆祝公司成立125周年。最早，雪佛龙的历史可以追溯到洛杉矶北部的碧可峡谷（现在是碧可峡谷油田）发现原油。这一发现导致了1879年雪佛龙公司最早的前身太平洋海岸石油公司的成立。另外一个前身是于1901年在德州波蒙特一个波纹铁皮建筑物里的三个屋子中成立的德州燃料公司。该公司看起来很朴素，后来成为闻名的德士古。
雪佛龙集团起初叫加州标准石油，或者简称SoCal，成立于约翰·D·洛克菲勒反垄断拆分期间的1911年。曾是20世纪早期控制美国石油工业的“七姐妹”之一。1933年，沙特阿拉伯赋予加州标准石油探油权，并在1938年发现了原油。1950年代早期，加州标准石油在沙特发现了世界上最大的加瓦尔油田。加州标准石油的子公司，加州-阿拉伯标准石油发展数年后于1944年成为阿拉伯美国石油公司（简称：阿美）。1973年，沙特政府开始收购阿美。到1980年，整个阿美归沙特所有，并于1988年更名为沙特阿拉伯石油公司（简称：沙特阿美）。
加州标准石油于1984年和海湾石油合并，成为当时历史上最大的购并案。在反垄断条例下，加州标准石油剥离了许多海湾石油的子公司，并把海湾石油的加油站和一个设在美国东部的炼油厂出售。加州标准石油更名为雪佛龙集团。[2] 1992年6月，达力智公司（NYSE: DYN）因雪佛龙的天然气和液化天然气业务和达力智的前身Natural Gas Clearinghouse公司（NYSE: NGC）。NGC在1994年成为综合天然气服务公司。[3] 2000年2月1日完成的一项购并案，伊利诺娃公司（NYSE: ILN）成为达力智公司旗下全资子公司，雪佛龙占有其28%的股份。[3]
2001年，雪佛龙集团兼并了德士古成为雪佛龙-德士古。2005年5月9日，雪佛龙德士古宣布放弃德士古一名，重新改回雪佛龙，而德士古依然是雪佛龙集团的一个品牌。2005年8月19日，雪佛龙并购了美国加州联合公司（优尼科），并因为优尼科在东南亚的大量地热开发而成为世界上最大的地热能源商。[4]
雪佛龙于2007年与中国石油天然气集团公司（中石油）签订了一项为期30年的天然气合作开发项目，雪佛龙（优尼科中国东海有限公司）作为作业方占有49%股份，中石油作为甲方占有51%股份。天然气项目位于中国四川省东北部地区（四川省宣汉县和重庆市开县）。项目于2008年组建，2009年开始修井，一开始预计2010年投产。但是这个项目由于各种各样的原因，进展十分缓慢。截至2012年底，没有新钻一口井，新的天然气净化厂也还在建设中（估计完成60%），管道铺设仍在进行中，首气遥遥无期。
新政策和发展[编辑]




雪佛龙在加州费尔罗斯500千瓦光伏项目


雪佛龙已经逐步开始减少温室气体排放，来获得更清洁的能源。[5]在美国的石油公司中，雪佛龙因为在可替代能源方面的巨大投资并定下目标来减少温室气体排放而获得了最高的评价。[5]雪佛龙为全球地热能最大生产商，所产生的能源足可供应给超过七百万家庭使用.[6]
市场品牌[编辑]




2006年前典型的雪佛龙加油站标志.






2006年雪佛龙开始逐步采用的加油站标志


燃油[编辑]

雪佛龙
标准石油 (有限条件)
德士古
加德士
海湾
优尼科
Dinoco

便利店[编辑]

Star Mart
Extra Mile
Redwood Market
Town Pantry

润滑油[编辑]

Delo (sold by Caltex and Chevron)
Havoline (sold by Caltex and Texaco)
Revtex (sold by Caltex)
Ursa (sold by Texaco)

燃油添加剂[编辑]

Techron - Chevron, Texaco (phased in during 2005), Caltex (phased in during 2006 and later)
Techron concentrate plus
Clean System 3 - Texaco (phased out during 2005 in favor of Techron)
PE Purescape

参考文献[编辑]


^ 1.0 1.1 1.2 1.3 1.4 4Q11 Earnings Release. Chevron Corporation. 2011-02-24. 
^ Chevron Products Homepage
^ 3.0 3.1 CHEVRON CORP. APPLAUDS DYNEGY-ILLINOVA MERGER 互联网档案馆的存档，存档日期2007-09-29., Chevron Press Release Archives, February 2, 2000
^ Chevron claims energy debate, BBC News, 2006-02-19  引文格式1维护：日期与年 (link)
^ 5.0 5.1 Quest for clean energy / Chevron, PG&E cited for positive steps to combat global warming
^ Chevron - Chevron Stories










查
论
编


 道琼斯工业平均指数成份股






目前组成股票



3M
苹果公司
高盛
美国运通
Visa
波音
卡特彼勒
雪佛龙
思科系统
可口可乐公司
杜邦
埃克森美孚
通用电气
耐克
家得宝
英特尔
IBM
强生
摩根大通
麦当劳
默沙东
微软
辉瑞
宝洁
旅行家集团
联合健康集团
联合技术
威讯
沃尔玛
华特迪士尼








前任组成股票



奥驰亚集团
卡夫食品
美国国际集团
美国烟草公司
花旗集团
通用汽车
伊士曼柯达
固特异
霍尼韦尔
国际纸业公司
北美洲公司
西尔斯罗巴克
美国联合碳化物
美国橡胶公司
美国铝业
惠普
AT&T
美国银行








外部链接[编辑]

官方网站





 
						取自“https://zh.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=雪佛龍&oldid=45380754”					
分类：纽约证券交易所上市公司道琼斯工业平均指数成份股1879年成立的公司美国石油公司跨国公司美国能源公司加德士隐藏分类：调用重复模板参数的页面Webarchive模板wayback链接引文格式1维护：日期与年使用过时图像语法的页面含有英语的条目维基百科和维基数据上的官方网站不同 



导航菜单


个人工具

没有登录讨论贡献创建账户登录 



命名空间

条目
讨论




大陆简体



不转换
简体
繁體
大陆简体
香港繁體
澳門繁體
马新简体
台灣正體






查看

阅读
编辑
查看历史



更多







搜索



 







导航


首页分类索引特色内容新闻动态最近更改随机条目 



帮助


帮助维基社群方针与指引互助客栈知识问答字词转换IRC即时聊天联络我们关于维基百科资助维基百科 



在其他项目中


维基共享资源 



打印/导出


下载为PDF 



工具


链入页面相关更改上传文件特殊页面可打印版本固定链接页面信息维基数据项引用本页 



其他语言


العربيةAzərbaycancaБългарскиCatalàČeštinaDanskDeutschEnglishEspañolEestiفارسیSuomiFrançais客家語/Hak-kâ-ngîעבריתहिन्दीBahasa IndonesiaItaliano日本語Қазақша한국어LatinaLietuviųമലയാളംNederlandsNorsk bokmålPolskiPortuguêsRomânăРусскийSrpskohrvatski / српскохрватскиSimple EnglishSvenskaไทยTürkçeУкраїнськаاردوTiếng ViệtWinarayBân-lâm-gú粵語 
编辑链接 





 本页面最后修订于2017年7月26日 (星期三) 20:02。
本站的全部文字在知识共享 署名-相同方式共享 3.0协议之条款下提供，附加条款亦可能应用（请参阅使用条款）。
Wikipedia®和维基百科标志是维基媒体基金会的注册商标；维基™是维基媒体基金会的商标。维基媒体基金会是在美国佛罗里达州登记的501(c)(3)免税、非营利、慈善机构。


隐私政策
关于维基百科
免责声明
开发者
Cookie声明
手机版视图



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.




















